Dude, your phone is ringing Dude...   Dude, your phone is ringing...
What with incest being illegal in most countries, yes, I doubt many people are going to come forwards. None of the places I found were really that great either. Mostly they were just peoples opinions apparently referencing some study that is impossible to find anywhere else.
 &gt; Also, a blue-ring's bite is totally painless (and DEADLY).   Seems rather pointless as a defense if it doesn't cause pain and kills almost 100% of the time. It sounds more like spite to me.
If America didn't have slaves it wouldn't have become an economic powerhouse.
and high..
Ask her to do it with her mouth full. Nudge, know what I mean? Wink, nudge
&gt;Most hedge funds are in free-fall.  No they're not.  *Some* hedge funds are in free fall... you don't know which ones are doing well until the end of the year (if you learn at all).  And you're right, many of the bankers wouldn't be able to find other work... but if you think they work their 80-hour weeks for a paltry $150,000 a year, you're crazy.  So they'd be unmotivated to do what it takes to get the company back off the ground, and would simply be looking for the next thing... maybe they wouldn't be able to get hired immediately, but they very well could stop putting the real effort in while they spend 6 months interviewing.  Not paying bankers or traders who do well is absolute anathema to a company...
deleted
Dude.  Why?  He'll just create a new account.  And in the age of Tor/proxies/dynamic addressing, banning his IP won't accomplish much either.  How about posting a call to action for something that **matters.**
These ads inspired me to vote for Kay Hagan the atheist today. She is an atheist right?
Well, go to the 3rd link, wizbangblog and click on the censored pics.  I doubt you'll think of her as skin &amp; bones after you've done that.
hey guys i can cherry pick a few cynical headlines about windows7 too, is my OS doing well now?
Part II, bolt cutters
While your idea certainly has an aristocratic air to it, there isn't a prize for being 'Noble'.   I suspect you mean the Nobel Prize, named for Swedish chemist Alfred Nobel.  And yes, I hate myself for being douchy enough to correct you.
Gee... Scstraus was cynical :D
Interesting how you really only replied to my first sentence while ignoring the rest of it, but fair enough I suppose. So seeing as I'm still trying to work out what you consider "worthwhile" developments of political leaders, and (correct me if I'm wrong) you also believe that anybody who hews to political reality eventually only thinks of winning, and since that means that nothing they do is worthwhile once they win, may I ask if you believe any recent president or political leader has incited anything worthwhile? &gt;Oh, you mean theoretically. Sure, the concept sounds great, and it makes for compelling fiction from time to time, but it never happens.  That sort of reminds me of libertarianism, no?
Anyone think that girl is 18?
&gt;Author: Eddie Weinstein The Guardian, Saturday January 12 2008  &gt;My Brother Israel  Why did he wait till he was 88 years old and 67 years later , yes SIXTY - SEVEN years later to wait till he finally wrote about his experience ?  Sorry to say but Fake Story is Fake
Your springs analogy is a good one. In fact, Rider says in his thesis (page 123) that if you could somehow extract and reinject energy into the plasma somehow (something he says external magnetic fields can't do) that maybe you could actually make fusors work. He also says (page 124) that the amount of energy you have to recirculate this way is quite small compared to the fusion power output.
There's a difference between subtle, tasteful ads and ones that jump in your face and dare you to close them.  Somebody needs to do an afterschool special where the kid wishes internet advertising would disappear and when he wakes up the whole internet is gone.  "But this is what you wanted, Billy! Those ads paid for all that wonderful content you enjoyed!"
Holy shit, not only was my ad. a floater, mine was a movie trailer with sound. Page fucking closed.
braaaainnnsss
You're assuming that a 40T trust wields the same amount of power than a judge or an average citizen.
mmh I logged in again this morning, and the functionality is gone. I also cannot find it in my Labs as an option anymore. 
But strangely it was all awry.
&gt; two labels address different questions: belief and knowledge Don't you have to have faith that your knowledge is correct?  Can someone not know lies?
Do you know what they call Proposition 8 in Holland?
I bet your a fat women.
I'd do it for $100. I gots no job!
I didn't know "&gt;&gt;" meant much greater than in mathematics, i'm use to it just being a bit shift operator.
I'm totally on board!
Which is why they have military types turn the key.
1) The FDIC always releases the news after 5pm on Friday. WaMu was an exception because it had leaked out early.  2) 5th/3rd was formed by a merger of the 5th street bank and 3rd street bank. 
It's true, but he has severely oversimplified the history and causal connection that led to his being born and brought up in America. While the statement he's made, as you've quoted it, does not explicitly say that slavery was justified because it "brought the blacks to a better place," he needs to be taught that there is a very wrong implication there. Not only must we keep in mind the immense suffering they went through, but just how much the economy of the United States was dependent on slave labor. At the end of the day, the United States would not have become the prosperous world power that it is today if the seed money hadn't been the money saved by not paying many of their workers. For that reason, a debt is owed to those slaves.  Secondly, we must keep in mind the immense damage done to Africa *because* of slavery and colonialism. Simply put, in this alternate reality the boy has devised, if it weren't for slavery, yeah, the kid would have grown up in a decrepit African nation. But that nation wouldn't be the hellhole it is now.  EDIT: Oh, and of course, another MAJOR reason why the kid's life is so great is the work done by all the civil rights leaders of the past century. They practically made *lemons* out of fucking *lemonade* -- I mean if there was a way to take a sample of lemonade in a lab and find its pH balance and distill it and clone a seed and grow lemons -- that's metaphorically what our great leaders fucking did. So, for him, America would also "stink" if it weren't for the work they did. And he needs to thank God every day for who his people are.  If you're still concerned about what he said, it would be wise to call his parents and tell him what you heard, and simply that it made you feel concerned.
Already did.  Mail-in ballots are a thing of beauty.
Fat people are supposed to be jelly.
"Shut up! now give us the key, the plans or whatever the hell you have!"  "I have a tank full of gentle Cuttlefish."
Why so hostile?
To make a point  He doesn't want to just win.  He wants to destroy McBush aristocracy
"Trick."
Wow it's nice to see the little Big Black lovefest i inspired by posting the "Problem With Music" article.
The 5 trillion does, but this is salt in a wound.  Everyone gets a bail out, the billionaire bankers so they can have their bonuses, the shareholders, the insurance companies so they can have their parties, homeowners that never owned anything or refinanced their house to death, and now I hear credit card companies and GM wants a hand out.  Where is mine!  What about my kids that want all the things these people got?  What about my kids that want a new chemistry lab?  What about my car that is perpetually breaking down, I would like a new one, and I could have if I took half of what I had to buy one and took a loan for the rest.  Why should I suck it up?  What is the economy doing for me?  Even in good times I have to work 70 hour weeks to provide a nice life for my family, so the government can tax it, and people can look down on me for not spending my self into a debt slave night mare.  Why should I help those arrogant assholes with their Abercrombie and Fitch clothes that pick on my kids and make my daughter cry?  Why should I be taxed so they can keep their big screen tvs, Rvs, and boats?  I didn't waste my money on those things.  I scrimp and save and cut corners and get nothing but shit on for it.  Everyone that is responsible does.  To hell with the irresponsible.  I pulled myself up from the street, they can too.   
..That Obama voted and lobbied for. Come on, Obama scumbags, tell me how much you love the bailout now.  Obama helped give the banksters robbing us blind over 5 trillion by voting for the bailout, and actively called members of the house to lobby votes for it. Get real, hes a pawn of the wall street finance oligarchs.  Democrats say Obama key in bailout vote switch http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20081003/pl_afp/usfinancebankingvoteobama  Obamas top contributors: Goldman Sachs $739,521 Citigroup Inc $492,548 JPMorgan Chase &amp; Co $475,112 Lehman Brothers $391,774 http://www.opensecrets.org/pres08/contrib.php?cycle=2008&amp;cid=N00009638
Ha, that ad made me want to vote for Hagen even more.  But seriously, what's wrong with an open-minded Christian? I think there should be more of them! I never realized that open-mindedness and acceptance of others we BAD traits.
The reason you hardly ever hear from moderate Muslims like us is because the media is filled by fucking morons like you.
thank you, the link died for me. 
I didn't say whether it was right or wrong. I don't think killing is ever right, but sometimes it is necessary.
"Legitimate ignorance"--good phrase.  It seems an impossible task to be informed of and remember every politician's voting record, every proposed policy measure and the vagaries of every important social issue.  A preponderantly ignorant public is easily manipulated into acting against their own interest if their only formal expression of political will is voting on subjects and for representatives they know little about.  Some like to blame the populace for their ignorance, but it really is "legitimate ignorance"--the body of knowledge required to cure it is so vast one cannot simultaneously learn it and make a living, especially among the poor.
Halloween costume? What are you, 5?
Tasers for everyone, yay!   Some people just don't like to resolve their conflicts like civilized human beings anymore it seems, because it's not considered "kewl".
I'd like a Vampire style MMO where you can establish influence and work behind the scenes against other players. Not just "get a group together and kill something," but actually have ways of making a name for yourself besides what you're wearing.
Why the fuck isn't he in jail yet?
very true - the Nazis justified the concentration camps to people as protection for the German race against the "evils" of the Jews and the Bolsheviks.  i regularly come across accounts where the S.S. justify to themselves - it's just "work", or a job that needs to be done - for the greater good..  theres a multitude of justifications for it.  which is quite scarey.  about the closest to it in recent memory is the Rwanda genocide. similar sentiments there.
Dude, I say, let 'em blow their money on this stupidity.  Assclowns.  They don't know how to run a campaign whatsoever, obviously.  As long as we're all downmodding this mofo, who gives a wet fart?
but I thought *he was* running against what reddit considers Jesus
"They come ...... in both inches and centimeters, in case you hook up with someone from Europe or Canada, or basically anywhere but the US."  i am confused. i just painted my house. too many paint fumes. can someone decipher this for me. anywhere but the US?
Did Orson Scott Card help him write that essay?
I wonder would she like some whine with that cheese.
Sounds like a very fascinating book, here's hoping it doesn't slip my mind.
you are yet another example of the rule 34 of the internets, lego version. 
Their futility?  Even if the election comes off without a hitch and Obama wins, nothing will change.  He's from the Democratic party.  The Democratic party has been in power in Congress for awhile, and they have not rescinded a single policy enacted by the Republicans.  Not one.  After 9/11 the only necessaryt hing that needed to be done to guarantee that there was never an attack such as it was to implement bulletproof cockpit doors.  That's it.  EVERYTHING else was a move to fascism and an unreasonable usurpation of power by the government.  Because of the extremely close (stolen) election of Bush, prior to 9/11 he was a lame duck.  He could do nothing since the public obviously did not like him.  After 9/11, it was the Democrats and the Republicans that gave him the go-ahead to build things like the Department of Homeland Security.  It was the Democrats and Republicans that put together and passed the PATRIOT Act.  Obama, nor anyone else in the Demcoratic party, has even CLAIMED that they will rescind Bushes policies.  What in the world leads you to believe that a vote for a third party is futile in an environment when a vote for one candidate and the vote for another make no difference?  I hope that Obama gets elected, I really do.  When his supporters no longer find themselves unable to imagine that he is different while they are being drafted to attack Iran, I will be here to say "I told you so."  And if it turns out differently, I most definitely will eat crow.  How much I would love to.  But there isn't actually any EVIDENCE to suggest such a far-fetched thing and hope doesn't change reality.
BFD. Start buying.
"Pics or it didn't happen" Video? "Must be faked"
From a star wars nerd in a cartoon about four buddies in college. forget the name of it of course.  Edit: he is holding a little tie fighter in his hand and is going pew pew pew while the camera pans away. A really funny moment
&gt; I showed that blacks are voting for the black guy over the white guy disproportionally, and that this was *obviously the fault of racism*.  How the flying fuck is this not equating correlation and causation? It's entirely plausible that black voters voted 100% for a black candidate for reasons entirely removed from race. Just because you don't want to think about or acknowledge other explanations doesn't mean they don't exist. Beyond claiming it as fact you have done absolutely nothing to demonstrate your claim is true.  Edit: You know what? Fuck you and your lack of imaginative trolling. You could at least throw some colorful insults or conspiracy theories into the mix to make it interesting.
&gt;They are toned exquistely to the guidelines used by rating groups like National Report.  Wait, but I thought the guidelines were fixed so that the colleges that everyone expected would be in the top 20...!
Yeah, there's nothing like free labor.
*"No real than you are."*  Implies people are fake. I can agree with this. I personally feel it also implies people can be whatever the fuck they want. I think the Halloween appearance date supports this. 
never mind the worm, who the hell is this Mark Eichen character and is that actually his style or is he Amish?
upmodded for teaching me a new word. paddywagon is full of win
Reported.  Maybe next time you will think before you post.
That's the Keynesian idea - in bad part of the cycle you can cut taxes, increase spending, and fuck budget deficit; you'll rebalance the budget in good part of the cycle when everybody has more money.  It's debatable if it really works or not, especially these days when private speculative capital is orders of magnitude larger than government budget, but nobody ever pulled the reverse trick. If you had huge deficits in economic boom (like Dubya) and then try to balance budget in economic bust (like president Palin after McCain dies), you're heading straight into the Great Depresion.
&gt; im simply defending the general idea of being able to get compensated for something you develop and design.  Why? What the fuck are YOU ever going to develop and design? What authority do YOU have to speak on this subject AT ALL?!  I'm a systems designer and I'm ambitious. More ambitious than you can ever imagine. And do you see **me** demanding to get compensated for my ideas OR ELSE? Do you see me wanting to hold other people hostage?  All I want is a halfway decent life which should be covered by a Guaranteed Income style system. And since that applies to everyone it doesn't qualify as "being compensated for my ideas".  The only compensation I demand for my ideas is recognition. So BOW TO ME.  &gt; Do you honestly not see any validity in any point I made?  No. I don't agree that medical and software are special cases. I don't agree that anecdotes and personal experience are the best way to argue a point. I don't agree that patents are less of a problem or less bogus in car manufacturing than they are in medical and software. And I especially do NOT agree that normality should be unquestioned until you have overwhelming evidence against it.  What points did you make that you believe deserve respect?
I've been sayin' this for years and everybody thought I was crazy, pfft!
Last word.
If you disagree with her, you're anti-American, and what could be more anti-American than infringing on someone's first-amendment rights?  Makes sense to me.
kill = say I told you so.
Don't say it.  You know what I'm talking about....just don't.
If the floor was unusually slippery, for example if it was wet, then there would indeed be a responsibility on the owner to have a warning.  You might have seen such warning signs from time to time.  Walking to the car would probably not be required unless there is some risk the owner can reasonably foresee, and it might be that they don't have a duty of care outside of their premises.  Telephones are made to a specification which is unlikely to damage hearing. You can be sure the manufacturer has tested this, and so it would not normally be reasonable to expect harm to be caused by a normally operating phone. For this reason the owner would probably not be liable.  I am just as bemused by daft litigation as anyone, but this would not be in that category.
*guilt* trip
More likely after the election.
http://icanhascheezburger.com/2007/01/14/i-has-a-bucket/
Hey, I don't know if it's just me, but it appears that this submission has been moved off of the front page.  I noticed an hour ago that it had taken the #1 spot front page, but now it doesn't appear within the first two pages at least.  It's only four hours old, there's no way it could have expired.  What's up with that?
Lawdy, lawdy!  Massa says I can vote juss today!  So's I's gonna do it!  Awww Lawdy praise jesus!
The reporter doing the narration sounded a lot like Dr. Katz.
Tired complaint is tired.
Is it wrong that I always am super hot for the Anglo-Jesus?  YUM~
It wasn't sarcasm, my man. It was just a poorly executed categorical error. If you had said "Oh, they have shoes in Muslim countries now?" it *still* wouldn't have been funny, but it would have been categorically linked. What you did was akin to seeing the kitteh in the Pringles can and saying "Hey, it ate my peanuts!" Feel me?
You aren't explaining why (falsely) believing something would be advantageous to a creature.  Certainly, I think lacking a **false belief** about the causes of things, objectively, could only be evolutionarily advantageous to a creature, from a practical perspective.  I think the (possible) evolutionary benefits of religion come bringing about emotional stability in those who believe it.  I.e., don't be sad that your life sucks, because you'll go to a happy place.  It seems like a short circuit around the logical reasoning that might (rationally) lead one to be dysfunctionally unhappy.
*ahem* OBAMA IS NWO, fucking learn something
This quote isn't by me, but I like it: To be sure of hitting the target, shoot first and call whatever you hit the target. 
Well he's right about Jesus being wrong for america. Get Jesus out of politics!
To each their own. Good luck in life.
it dont matter dat we is stupid, as long as we cans shoot missles at thems udder peeples dat dont licke us
And you also got all that money from working at the second company...
Can you roll it up though?   This could lead to video message in a bottles.
Let's give him the benefit of the doubt; maybe he slayed a chav.
I'm wearing a S.T.F.I.L. shirt
$7,000 is a [year's salary](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richest_country) in the Dominican Republic. $20,000 is just under half a year's salary here in the USA. So in a way, it's half the price here.
exactly my point.. i don't elect anyone, but you think i am like all these religious nuts... thank you for that comment. anyone who downvoted this thread better check their egos and hatred and remember why you elected obama because he's the best candidate not because you hate bush.. because if you are voting just out of the hatred displayed in this thread, baldwin, paul or another independent would win.
*looks at you*  *shakes head in disgust*  *walks away slowly*
Its not really a game, its a tax on people who can't calculate probabilities... If it sounds to good to be true...
Yup another way the responsible get screwed.
I wrote an [article](http://antiyawn.com/voltisdoomed.html) about this actually...  Sorry, I guess the video got taken down.
Don't put words in my mouth - it's unbecoming. I don't think "mankind" *should* be free of religion -- that's none of my business as long as they don't MAKE it my business (e.g., California's Prop 8 gay marriage ban, etc.), but I do believe I'm free to ridicule peoples' stupid concepts if I view them as such.  I'll just skip over the bad underwear analogy and FYI: I have zero "beliefs" in anything that approaches the absurdity of religion. I kinda like empirical evidence.
Because they know....they also have a severe complex about the holocaust and waving flags...although those are finally starting to dissipate after all these years.
Walked to the pub ketted off my face thinking the world was made of stage scenery.  Good times.
It will be feverishly watched in Utah, I am sure...  &gt;Utah County, Utah, is one of the most conservative communities in the nation, judging from voting records in presidential elections. In a mid-1990s court case, Randy Spencer, a court-appointed attorney, defended a Utah County video store whose owner had been charged with 15 counts of obscenity for renting adult tapes. The prosecutors claimed the store was violating the community standards of suburban Provo. &gt; &gt;Spencer subpoenaed records that showed the following: Utah County cable subscribers had ordered at least 20,000 explicit movies in the past two years; a local video store was deriving 20 percent of its rental sales from adult movies, even though adult movies only made up 2 percent of the store's inventory; a nearby adult store was racking up on average $111,000 dollars per year selling sex toys and other adult fare; and the Provo Marriott, literally across the street from the courthouse, had sold 3,448 adult pay-per-view movie rentals in 1998 alone. Spencer won the case.
Why does he have to be such an asshole!  FUCK
Do you think that they're really immune?  I mean, I know they do the whole "We break you down, destroy you, and then re-build you in our image" thing, but are they actually able to destroy the soldiers humanity?  I mean, sure they can convince them to shoot completely innocent people in other countries, but wipe out the human race?  Or even thousands and thousands of people in a situation where failing to do so would be entirely without effect aside from removing their guilt?
or a year of President McCain, then 3 years of President Palin &amp; Vice President Cheney.
Not everyone is Doc Holiday, you know.
Try Here: http://tagoo.ru/search.php?for=audio&amp;search=thievery+corporation&amp;artist=on&amp;bitrate=3&amp;playtime=2
Either you're lying or you don't really live in a major US city.  Any week long power outage in a "MAJOR" city would be national news.
Gorgons such as Medusa always freaked me out as a kid.
Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying War against them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort.
Why does this douchebag still sell his halfass music?
Yes, that is a clear limit to science.  It simply does not extend to phenomenon outside the material world.   Science *can* study the physical manifestations as they occur in our bodies, perhaps.  (For example, if you found a group of people who regularly had religious experiences, you could measure their brain waves or heart rates, etc, and science could then create *materialistic theories* about religious experiences in our brains or our DNA, but that's it's limits, its edge, beyond which it really stops being "science".  Then it falls outside the purview of science.  Don't get mad at science, though, for having limits.  It's like getting upset at mathematics because it doesn't talk about the rules of basketball or why you like sugar in your coffee while I don't.  Of course, you can use scientific principals to study the supernatural.  A recent scientific double-blind study was performed that showed that  in fact, prayer *doesn't* work.   By the way, if prayer *did* work, science would then look at materialistic reasons, perhaps study low-level frequencies.  Science would never posit that there was a Supernatural being that made things occur. Just like Math won't tell you that a player can't take more than 2 steps without bouncing the ball in Basketball.
&gt;She's a menace to democracy and I guarantee we'll see more of her in the coming years.  My hunch is that she'll lose her governor seat in the next election and pretty much disappear. The national spotlight has exposed a lot of blemishes that she could keep low-key up in quiet Alaska.  Either scenario should be interesting, though. Like others have said, I'd love to see her run for president and brave the Republican nomination process. She how she does when it's her own colleagues, ten times as vicious as anything she's seen so far, tearing her apart. No liberal elitists or gotcha media to blame it on, and no senior Republicans full of faux outrage rushing to her side with a tissue.
Holy shit this is awesome. So many zombies! And I like the emphasis on how teamwork keeps them alive.  I feel sorry for them, though -- the last line is about how they have to get out of the city, but we all know they'll never really escape the city since we'll be shooting zombies with them for the next decade.
More than one exclamation point needed?  My glass house is designed strictly for the exhibitionist in me.
&gt; Don't you have to have faith that your knowledge is correct?  You can't have faith that knowledge is correct, that's an oxymoron. Faith is belief without evidence (that is, belief without knowledge). If you had "knowledge" then you wouldn't need to have faith.  &gt; Can someone not know lies?  I don't understand the question. Can you re-phrase or explain in more detail?
Just a backup dancer for Weird Al.
&gt;HAHAHAHA IT'S SO FUNNY BACAUSE IT'S A FEMALE TEACHER LET'S GET THESE KIDS TYHEIR LUCKIEST BOYS IN DEUTSCHLAND MEDALS OLOLOLOLOLOLOL  If it was a guy you'd call him a sick pedo. Fucking sexist cocksucker.
If I see one more "happy halloween, reddit" post I'm going to pull my hair out.
I wonder how much police time and money some dumb fuck constable just wasted on a dillusion?
Fail. Jesus talks about helping the poor but never once insinuates that government ought to be used to do the redistributing.
obvious troll is obvious
I don't know, I like the fact that I am not forced to slaughter everything in sight just to level up.  It was an excellent design decision from my perspective, even if it may be a little counter intuitive to get as much exp for hacking a pc as killing a big minigun-toting mutant.  Regarding lock picking, I find myself really short of bobby pins most of the time, to the point that I don't pick locks all that often because I'm afraid that I'll run out and not have any when I might really want them.  If I remember correctly, lockpicks were way more common in Oblivion than the bobby pins are in Fallout 3.
I'm pretty sure *you* could, to be honest.
Logged in just to hit your down arrow? Heh you saw all "Western" governments? The Glorious People's Republic of ___________ from all over the world come to mind. Where are you from, China?
The truth is, "store of value" is something that exists only in the mind.  Perhaps we should use minds as a store of value.
Go directly to jail.
Hey, has this submission been removed from the front page for you as well?  I looked an hour ago and it was at the #1 position on the front page and now I can't find it anywhere on the first four pages.  What's up with that?
Digsby supports text messaging too.
If the internet had it's way, I think Ron Paul would have won. These trends are a useful predictor, but we won't know for sure until after Tuesday
Or you can say it shows who's the least known candidate. Or, more likely, who's being researched and possibly reevaluated.
I believe I can fly, I believe I can touch the sky...
Fair enough.
Yep.  Sprint in the US wont let me do any of that unless I spend at least $15/mo for a "picture only" data plan, or $60/mo for the full deal.  I don't know if I'd even be able to use Bluetooth for any of that, or if it would have to go through their network.
I hope it was real and the kid's mom wasn't cool about it.  how evil is that, not to loose your cool and throw it away but totally fuck with your kids head first!  GO MOM.  (btw im a parent and think it should be legal.)
Their heavy weapons specialist has some steel-toed boots.
Credit where credit is due! I got the idea from this [article on the pumpkin shortage](http://www.businesspundit.com/pumpkin-shortage-could-mean-a-sad-halloween/).
Is it sad that i, being non-U.S. citizen, understand 90% of these words/phrases?  Goddamn you, reddit.
Iraq is kicking them out in 2011.  Why don't you define these terms of "victory" if you are so worried¿
How did your parents feel about it at the time?
Also shows that history is written by the winners. While everyone remembers the Jewish Holocaust everyone likes to ignore the German holocaust that happened right after the end of WW2. When the Allied nations set up prison camps to kill off massive amounts of fomer nazis and nazi sympathizers, and a bunch of innocent germans that got caught up as well.  Its said to have killed millions. The Russians also set up a similiar one on the east side.  Yet, its not in any history books you will find in school
You brain does not have the required receptors to fell pain. I am truly sorry for your lots.
_You know what?_ You are a lost cause. You have not once given me a reason entirely removed from race to explain the statistics, you've been insulting and rude. You are a foolish and ignorant person, and I'm just done with you.
He was actually Jewish.
Don't forget the American explanations for Guantanomo Bay, for unleashing Blackwater on the completely innocent public of Iraq, for their actions in World War 2 of herding Japanese citizens into camps, etc, etc.  It's ALWAYS done in the name of the "greater good".  All you've got to do is remember that ANYONE advocating the "greater good" is a rapist.  Do not turn your back on them, they will rape you.  Not just your body, but your soul, and that of every person you love.  No matter what they promise you, you have to be steadfast in your desire for justice and fairness over and above any "goodness" they claim they can bring.  Someone always has to suffer for one side to get more than their actions warrant them in a system based on justice.
From what I've been able to observe, Republicans lost touch with reality a long time ago.
&gt;But, I wonder if there's a bit of a tendency to romanticize in retrospect.  Probably.  Still, it seems to me that half the pleasure you get from doing that kind of thing is remembering it.  So the romanticism is like a free bonus.
Does it really matter as long as they're voting for your guy?
&gt; SO WHERE ARE YOU NOW, you atheists eh?  [Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/)
Yes. Threatening violence solves most spam problems.
define it on your own terms. the 'less' part of it has a negative connotation, let alone the historical ones. I'd say the label is a lost cause, use something else. After all, you don't say youre anti-life, you say youre prochoice for the same reason.
Wassup dawg?!
so, why is this in web design?
As I said below, and just for the record, it wasn't my idea but I took it from [here](http://www.businesspundit.com/pumpkin-shortage-could-mean-a-sad-halloween/)
I clicked this link, even before reading the entire headline.
Do it then make your costume around it.
I have Mozilla Firefox...no ads/pop-up/floaters anything =)  I win
The US is the only major country that uses inches.  Centimeters are used in the rest of the world.
Nazism, really?
&gt;Render unto Caesar the things which are Caesar’s  Gee, what if the government would make up tales of an idolized hero that promoted taxes? Nah that couldn't be the case, right, right?  Christians?  Your messiah couldn't be made up to keep you under control, right?  Right? 
I'd say it's mostly the last one though, seeing as how it's the one thing pretty much every tyrant really _does_ have in common with Hitler.
have you never heard of dane cook?
he's just as good!11
And while we're at it, let's seat senators proportionally, like we do with House members. Why should Wyoming with its 500,000 get as many as California with its 36 million?
Well since I'm not voting for either McCain or Obama, tease all you will.  I'm just being realistic
Wrong. They make money when the money they lent is paid back with interest.  They won't GROW if they don't have new loans.
zzzzzzzzzzzap zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzap
In socialist Canada everyone pays for the ads.
What about the Esquilax?...with the head of a rabbit AND the body of a rabbit.
Great choice.  It's Halloween and even hearing Dick Cheney's name scares the *hite out of me!
When you owe significantly more on a house than it's worth, how is selling it a better idea than handing in the keys?
I'm guessing that Midwest Airlines ran the numbers, so to speak, and decided people would choke down the chunks.
He isn't black. Look at the picture.
Patents have absolutely nothing to do with source code. If something is patented, you can implemented it from scratch all by yourself (never even see the original source code), and yet you'll still have to pay licence fee.
"Diphtheria"
She still thinks that the VP runs the Senate...
This is really creative.  
There are only 3 countries which are not standardized on the Metric system. The US, Liberia and Myanmar.  So, they're marked in inches and centimeters, so that the Japanese girl giving you a hummer can see how big you are in units she can grasp easily (centimeters) as easily as the chick from Arizona State can.
hmm, yes, those seem to be the general arguments for socialism...
Had to have a direct link, couldn't figure out other way.   Site is: http://www.photoflavor.com/
NancyGracesTesticles (hee hee) is wrong, but not as wrong as you think.
Armies of naked people are massing on foreign shore even as I speak. If we don't act now to protect our children they will soon attack, turning our own lust-filled hearts against us. We must begin adding saltpeter to our water supply **before it is too late!!!**
I totally agree, Cuttlefish are superior to humans in MANY ways!
Saw's going on tonight. How scary exactly is it? Like, "oh crap he cut his arm off" or what.
You're mistaking patents with copyright (and your school's rules): http://www.reddit.com/r/science/comments/7ajka/software_no_longer_patentable_big_victory_for/c064gyu P.S. Wikipedia lets anyone copy the text it contain, yet it still would be academic misconduct to do it.
The people she surrounds herself with probably don't care, but those outside of your bubble clearly do care.
Were they admitted into the Guinness Book of Records even though they did that?
I'm not "godless," I'm "god-free."
Staying after work to play games... for some reason that strikes me as strange, I would be trying to leave work early to play. I don't get it, do you have a 360 and no home to play it at?  Or do you work at a hash bar or something?
Last I checked the first amendment had these rights of assembly and petition. Did they take those out, or something?  It might be silly to protest if the election is carried out properly, but it's certainly allowed in the rules.
There is more to it than just government.  You have your family, career, etc.  It is an intolerance so widespread that it is hardly noticed...  seems encouraged.  
I'm not sure if people here understand what caused the mess. It's much more due to rating agencies such as Moody's and S&amp;P than partners at investment banks. What happened wasn't a simple mistake of these banks purchasing these mortgage-backed securities, but moreso a breakdown in the process by which these loans went from the originators to the buyers.  --edit-- If people want to just downmod without having an intelligent discussion, I'm done contributing. Go get a fucking education at a business school, because it's practically charity for people who actually know what they're talking about to wade into the youtube-like comments about the economy on Reddit.
I was on Frostfell too! What was your name? Remember that arrogant PK Quikai? I had a level 114 named Shoruken before I quit.
The fact is: They got suckers on the hook for the PREVIOUS value of the property and don't want to lose them and try to recoup by reselling the forclosed property at the current value.   Absofuckinlootly nothing altruistic about it.
"**GIVE US THE CUDDLEFI-**-awww, I can't do this."
&gt; Kant argued that moral demands must come simply from their being the demands of each person's own rational will. But what makes your rational will good? What makes this a universal principle?  Read Kant! You clearly haven't.  &gt; As for Rand she contradicts herself.  She does not in the least. John Ku grossly misunderstands Rand. When he says 'the only reading that will make such a statement true is to take "man" as meaning man the collective or man the species', he is dead wrong! That's not at all what she means. I'd advise you to read Rand yourself, which you've clearly not done else you'd not cite such garbage. Your dishonesty isn't going to help you learn anything—you seem more interested in winning an argument.
I was once told that 9 out of 10 CPU instructions executed on the planet are working towards solving a linear program.  Anyone know if this is true?
Atheism isn't a religion. Discriminating against atheists has nothing to do with religion and therefore has nothing to do with seperation of church and state.  Unless you are claiming that atheism is a religion, are you ?
Find and watch the fractal episode of NOVA, it aired last week.
Vote against 1A.  1A raises $10 billion for a $45 billion project.  The rest is allegedly going to come from federal funding, which has never exceeded $10 billion, for a $25 billion shortfall.  This is to be made up by individual investors, who are guaranteed a return on investment, but most public transit systems operate on a loss.  What's on the table cost-wise can not pay for what they're offering benefit-wise.  Voting for Proposition 1A is like voting for the Oregon monorail.
hahaha that is the perfect response i wish you would have been there to say that on film that would have been classic
in the protestant tradition "good works" are a result of (or a proof of) faith. They are not "required" in-and-of themselves, but without them one can not be considered to have faith. 
Folks who say that might as well say that they are afraid of n***ERS.   Obama is the most set man to become a president than most of any other man who has held that seat. You dont get more honesty and integrity than Mr Obama
At the bottom of the sea. In a pineapple house.
It's about funding religious and/or atheist groups. If the girlfriend insists on sending 10% of their pooled income to a religious group, the boyfriend can insist that half of it goes to an atheist group. There's nothing wrong with feeding people of course, but it's a different topic.
Talkin bout that dang old Fox wuz in the dang old whatsit lookin like, dang old, jerks.
This very good looking voice recorder app is currently having a promotion which is free for a limited time.  It does not have time limit for recording, and the interface is just like a classic voice recorder…Easy sync recordings to your pc with wi-fi via one button in the recording screen…
It purports to be James's box, not Jesus's.
Going to a movie.  I won't even check on the election untill Wednesday.  Too stressful. 
One question I have is, do you have the ability to lift and transport a 12" scope? All other things being equal, aperture matters. You will be able to see more with a larger diameter mirror.   I'm not sure of a website that shows real-time object comparisons through various size scopes, but Obsession Telescope's website has a simulation of what M13 looks like in an 8" telescope vs. scopes of larger size. You'll notice a huge difference in a 12" scope over an 8". 
Boobies are boobies; I don't care where they come from.  :)
I never understood how people could like Apple while hating Microsoft for their practices. Can someone explain?
If McCain or Palin had a long term relationship with a KKK pastor,or an abortion clinic bomber,would it be considered a smear to talk about it?  That is a rhetorical question.  A joke. ***  Basically,the tanked media is working with the Obama campaign to shout down dissent and criticism. It is variously racist,or an attack,pick one.  Obama's campaign has openly shut out stations and reporters that ask hard questions,is now removing news crews from the traveling roadshow,earlier threatened the FCC license of a radio station that dared have a guest they did not like.  They routinely threaten access to anyone that does not play along.  If the press does not report it,it is suppressed, the LAT Khalidi tape,for example.  The issue is the current lack of integrity in the media.  It is a legitimate issue.   If the roles were reversed,people here would be screaming.
Same thing here, but just the tip of me.
It's to keep her from embarrassing herself any more.
ugh.
Golden opportunity here: Appear on stage with the guy. Shake his hand. Give a speech about how the parties need to stop this petty bickering because we have problems that affects BOTH sides. Avoid topics where you disagree. Focus on the common ground. Yada yada yada.   Or...act like an asshole and kick anyone that disagrees with you out of site. Stay classy, guys.
They will just exploded into little bitty bits of pure evil and blow away with the wind.  
You're thinking about this a bit simple mindedly, but I'm not going to walk into an uphill semantics argument. You're definitely not an agnostic, though.  You have faith in your knowledge.
Maney asserts that YAF spews "anti-gay, anti-Semitism, anti-feminism and anti-Islamic propaganda," but he is only partially correct. YAF hates all things that are antithetical to Western civilization, freedom and tradition.
&gt; It is people like you that doesn't allow agree to disagree to work.  Eliezer Yudkowsky has written extensively on the "agree to disagree" myth.  You can find his writings on overcomingbias.com.  There you will find a reasoned argument why "agree to disagree" is a myth in the plane of discussions about factual matters.  Overcoming Bias is absolutely awesome.  That's my opinion.  &gt; Do you really think that everything is either wrong or right and there is no grey are in the middle?  No.  The fact that "agree to disagree" is a myth does not mean that the world is black and white.  Morally, it's all shades of grey.  But a shade of grey is not to be ascertained by personal mores and opinions.  It is to be ascertained by an objective framework of rational morality.  Likewise for scientific research.  Creationism has been throughly debunked by evolution research and factual evidence culled from the real world.  So the two theories aren't equally valid.  Which means that spending resources in the invalid theory is a net loss for progress and humanity.  &gt; Does that mean everyone has to be gay or everyone has to be straight, and we cannot coexist together?  Does that mean everyone has to be a vegetarian, or we cannot coexist together?  Certainly not.  Those are matters of personal choice and aesthetic preference, not matters decidable by morality.  &gt; Just because in your mind, everything that you believe seems right  Please step out of the relativist fantasy.  There IS such a thing as incorrect and correct, there is also such a thing as morally wrong and morally right, and both CAN be ascertained by looking at evidence and reasoning about it.  When I say something is *incorrect* or *wrong*, I say it confident that I can prove it to you through rational thought and real-world evidence.  It is not my opinion, but a matter of fact, which you will be able to reproduce if you do the experiment.  Conversely, when I express my opinion based on a hunch or competing theories one of which is slightly more probable than other, I explicitly tell you "I am not sure, but I think...".  In the matter of evolution vs. creation, I do not "think" one is correct and one is incorrect.  I am *certain* that evolution is correct and creation is incorrect, beyond a shadow of doubt, through overwhelming evidence.  I am also *certain* that investing resources into creation is *wrong*, because it takes resources away from research into the correct theory which will yield human progress.  I can also be *certain* that I have no right to dictate how other people's resources are to be spent, since those resources aren't mine.  It would be *morally wrong* for me to attempt to wrest those resources out of their hands, just to serve my conclusions.  But it is *morally right* for me to publicly criticize them and shame them into compliance.  &gt; doesn't mean that it is the definite answer.  The definite answer comes from evaluating the evidence using logically valid thought processes.  &gt; I guarantee that those who adamantly disagree with you believe the same things about their ideals and your arguments towards them seem just as crazy as theirs sound to you.  I only sound crazy to you because you have not been sufficiently exposed to the notion that things, beliefs, and opinions can be contrasted with reality well enough to ascertain their validity.  &gt; You are just another stubborn fool who creates the conflict in this world.  I prefer to think of myself as a stubborn sonuvabitch who won't accept the notion that all theories, opinions and morals are equally valid.  After all, if you don't make a decision, all you get is a cesspool of opinion, masses vocally advocating each one of them without any proof of them.  And that breeds stagnation, not progress.  But hey, you're the one demonizing me, and not the other way around.  Judging from historical evidence, it means I must have been doing something right.
I sure hope so, I've had the game for three days and I'm over 100 saves already.
It's illegal by the definition. Meaning if you do it, you very well may go to jail. He isn't saying not to do it or that he won't, just that it is, in fact, illegal.
That *is* happy, thank-you kaehyu.
Fair enough, but if you're going to be going on about "this is *my* reddit," I think you're missing the point of social bookmarking sites. Indeed, you're the only one that seems to be posting here, and yes you made /r/boobies, but if all you wanted was a place to dump pics of tits that you yourself like from one site, there's myriad ways to do that, not the least of which is the bookmarks toolbar in your browser. Social bookmarking sites have the positive attribute of having a community build something and add to it in different ways, as opposed to single-party controlled sites. Windows vs Linux. What I was doing wasn't nonproductive complaining, as evidenced by the fact that there's not one downvote to this post. You have to admit though-- it looks a little fishy when only one site is linked to 20 different times in one reddit.  But hey, you're right-- if I want it bad enough I can go and make my own reddit and populate it with pictures from three different sites at my will. I wont be doing that, however, because I don't have the time to gopher through tons of porn sites. There's already a plethora of porn aggrigators out there and my time is probably best spent on other things. Thanks for the links though. I'll be looking.
haha
That's nothing, check these cheeky octopuses (NSFW or for anywhere)  http://genki-genki.com/themes/genki_white/images/site/pake/alltm/tm_gen005.jpg  http://genki-genki.com/themes/genki_white/images/site/pake/alltm/tm_gen010.jpg  http://genki-genki.com/themes/genki_white/images/site/pake/alltm/tm_gen017.jpg
You are saying we should spend *our* money (we who actually have some to spare) to keep house-prices artificially inflated (so we can't ever buy one) until it eventually collapses *anyway*, just to keep those who loaned 10 times more than us without thinking that some had to pay, *those* at float for a little longer? Those who refinanced their all-of-a-sudden-$500k homes and spent $50k outright on personal luxury? Those who took out real money of artificial value and spent it before they had made their downpayment?  Are you saying we, who were responsible, and way worse off than them (except ofcourse we can pay our bills), we pay their bills just to make them feel comfy, they keep their houses, while we keep renting, just for a little longer until it inevitably collapses anyway?  Is that how you say we should spend our money? You know what? I say screw that.
&gt;The problem is that the fact that English is the standard international language was giving an advantage to native English speakers in a French territory, for a well paid job. It's not wrong per se, but it can (and was) offensive to the French living there.  You know what sucks about Canada? Bilingualism. I'm not saying that your example is bad, but in BC, to get a federal government job, priority immediately goes to those who speak French. The French language is irrelevant in BC. What's even more puzzling is that the strongest FM station in BC is Radio-Canada. Not only is pan-Canadian bilingualism wasteful, but it also ignores the reality that we are not a bilingual nation.
So are you trying to tell me that our patent system as it is today was born out of ignorance?  That the people who made the decisions really had no right or qualification to make such a decision?  Because if that's the case, I wholeheartedly agree with you. I'm just glad these people didn't empower AT&amp;T to patent the command line when they created Unix, or Xerox to patent the GUI.  We would have never had MS Dos then later Windows otherwise.  OK well maybe the word "never" is a bit of an exaggeration - more like we would be able to look forward to Windows 3.1 50 years from now.
Lending even more credence to the argument that if slave trade didn't exist, Africa would be far better off relative to the US than it is today.
Jez, read the bible. Jesus is an asshole.
Actually, ignoring my facetious original comment, I remember being taught Welsh when at kindergarten in Cardiff (I lived there until I was three years old) and I once pointed out the meaning of a word on a sign to my Dad who had, almost rhetorically, just said "What's all that rubbish mean?!". According to my Mum, it just made him more angry.
You can just delete the post...
Same here.
Not how we roll.  What kind of social news site do you think this is? ;)
The polls were correct. It was the vote counts that were wrong.  This has been proven for both 2000 and 2004, although so far after the fact that the bush coup was a fait accompli in both cases.
I like fucking shit up as much as the next guy but luggage? Seriously?
seeing the translation service costs across the public sector, whoever is responsible for this should be kicked out of their job IMHO.
Actually, many philosophical libertarians are not particularly fond of corporations.  A corporation is a gov't created entity that doesn't have the liabilities of a person, by government edict.  They can do harm a person might do, and yet be immune to felony punishment or civil tort.  Corporations aren't NECESSARILY evil, and want your blood, but it's a good way for a libertarian to bet, all else being equal.  Corporatism and free market libertarian ideals do NOT necessarily go hand in hand.
Steve Albini ftw! A little Dead Billy and that would top it off.
You lost me with your laboratory lemonade metaphor...
You can tell them that independent experts examine the original document and determine that it is real and they will tell you the state of Hawaii is helping Obama.  You show them the birth announcement in the newspaper they'll tell you that his grandparents put that there.  There could a video and a picture with a negative of JFK delivering Obama in the Lincoln bedroom and they will still tell you it's a fake and he was born in Kenya.
Right now, I have a 4" f/5 refractor-- great little grab-and-go scope. I am saving up for a 15" Obsession Dobsonian.
Yes.
I totally agree. How many educational opportunities like this (i.e. teachers gone wild) have been lost? Also I think Fredrick's of Hollywood should immediately begin donating lacy push-up bras and crotchless panties to educators worldwide.
This is likely the best post I've ever read on reddit.  Although, I wasn't sure if you were going to get super cuttlefish powers by the end.  You know what I mean... school trip, 16 fish - staff member thinks their all still there, etc.
Hey, I don't know if it's just me, but it appears that this submission has been moved off of the front page. I noticed an hour ago that it had taken the #1 spot front page, but now it doesn't appear within the first two pages at least. It's only four hours old, there's no way it could have expired. What's up with that?
&gt;She told me that the idea for the protest came from young people in her congregation who had visited "The Devil's Playground" and were disturbed by its depiction of an unforgiving God turning his back on victims of sexual abuse.  she should consider the plight of  [*male*](http://boysite.info/blog/?p=7) victims.
I don't wanna hype it up too much, but this moment on Mtv's Cutting Edge (yeah Mtv actually used to interview and tape bands that weren't on major labels) actually changed my life. Enjoy!
According to many experts it won't be.
Hey, I don't know if it's just me, but it appears that this submission has been moved off of the front page. I noticed an hour ago that it had taken the #1 spot front page, but now it doesn't appear within the first two pages at least. It's only four hours old, there's no way it could have expired. What's up with that?
When you join up with iGaming Pros we give you an exclusive 35% revenue share, the normal rate is only 25%. All you have to do to earn this premium commission is sign up with our special links or banner. 
How about someone puts you through a concentration camp where 100 out of 850,000 survived, and see how long till you come out with a book?
Uhhhgg... Soulja Boy *probably* meant that remark to be something that would raise eyebrows. No matter how smart or stupid he may be, he's inherently gifted at drawing attention to himself. You call that publicizing if it makes you money.  It does seem to be incredibly insensitive, akin to saying that the rise of the Nazis resulted in German Jew's getting to see more of the world as they fled persecution, but maybe Soulja truly perceives enforced migration as beneficial to him and his peers.  I know a lot of kids who really believe America is a kind of promised land, and think that Africa as being basically desert, jungle, and shacks. With that kind of perspective, giving thanks to slave masters doesn't really seem that ludicrous.  Me? I'm with [Bob](http://video.google.com/videosearch?q=bob%20marley%20slave%20driver&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wv#) on this one.
Not to mention Durham and Wilmington. But Charlotte and the Triad are still very socially conservative. I think you're right in spotting a trend, but I don't think it's as far along as you think.  (BTW - I thought I was the only one who called that section of Cary "Little India." I love how it sprang up in under five years.)
HTC makes a damn nice phone. I still love my hermes.
&gt; Greenwald has a well established reputation as an unhinged nut,who rarely gets beyond personal attacks.  This has not been my experience with what I've read by Greenwald.  I've seen that he tends to back his criticism with historic facts and context, such as the text of the First Amendment in this case (though perhaps this one was a little too easy).  Do you consider Greenwald's criticisms unfounded or inadequately explained?  Or are you turned off by personal criticism in general?
They thought they would all vote no then they could say see what the no voting dems did to america and the world they shit there pants when the dems seen stright through it left the republicans holding the whole bag.  Please we spent the surplus you left us and we need 850 billion more to prop up republicanism until after the elections.  Please can you give everything the poor have worked for and give it to the rich.  If us rich people have to file bankruptcy too we wont have anything to lord over the masses and it will be every man for himself.  Dont worry if i suspend my campaign for president that will fix it.
I'd propose a double-blind study to you. In a double blind study, neither the experiment administrator nor the subject knows which is the real thing and which is fake. So it's very important that neither you nor the person serving you the wine knows which wine came from which cup.  So, get a bottle of wine. Then, get two glasses - one is the fancy glass and the other is not. Get one person, who stays in another room, to pour the wine straight from the bottle into both glasses and let it sit there for... I dunno, three minutes? Then have that same person pour both glasses into cheap plastic cups. Have him write 1 on one cup and 2 on the other with a marker, as randomly as possible. (I.e., don't always put the same number on the cup with the fancy glass wine. If he can't generate random numbers well enough himself, get him a fair coin to flip each time.)  Get a second person (who was outside the room while the wine was being moved around from cup to cup) to carry the cups out to you in the other room. You taste both cups, and say which one came from the fancy glass and which one came from the normal glass. Record the results. Throw away the plastic cups after each round.  Do this several times. Ideally you'd like it to be hundreds, but I think you'd die of alcohol poisoning long before you finished the hundredth cup. So maybe do it twenty times? (I guess strictly speaking, you don't have to swallow the wine, just taste it...)  At the end of all the trials, give the clipboard with the results to the person who filled the cups and have them check and see how often you go it right. If this fancy cup actually has any effect at all, you'd better be picking the correct cup better than 60% of the time. Remember, just by picking between the cups totally at random, you'd be right 50% of the time. So you have to be right a lot more than that. It's real easy to pick the right one by luck about 55% of the time.   If you do this, come back and post about it. I'm curious to know if there would be any effect at all. It's possible the design of the glass might warm the wine more, or something. Which could cause more of the nice-smelling phenols in the wine to evaporate. Taste is half smell, so a warmer wine could taste better than a cold one. (Still, if you let the wine sit in both the fancy glass and the non-fancy glass for 3 minutes, you'd expect the wine in both glasses would be the same temperature...)
&gt; I would be willing to bet you were circumcised.  Because you're dumb. As I will prove.  Circumcision is very rare outside of savage countries such as the USA, Africa and Israel.  Atheism is very rare in the USA.  Given that reddit has an international audience and given that I am obviously anti-religious, the probability is overwhelming that I am not an American.  There aren't very many Africans around reddit. There aren't very many Israelis on the planet.  So I am overwhelmingly likely to NOT be circumcized.  &gt; would I say that to a new parent?  I would. What the fuck is wrong with you? Oh yeah, you're dumb.  &gt; If you really want to change the world, learn these subtle yet important skills.  Yeah, because I should take lessons on how to change the world from dumb people. Hmmm lemme think about that for a minute. Nope, I don't think so. I've got a really good plan to change the world and pandering to dumb sadistic fucks (or whatever) isn't part of it. But then I CAN actually change the world. The WHOLE world. I don't need to pretend that changing a couple people's minds on one topic is "changing the world".  You know what's so offensive about letting Down's syndrome go unchallenged? It's the fact average people are severely mentally disabled compared to me. So to then tolerate people who are severely mentally disabled _compared to average people_ ... Fuck, I mean fuck!
I love halloween I get soo much fucking pussy. Just for the price of a few bags of candy, beer, and too much trust on their parents part.
go fuck yourself
You have to tell mattbeetee how first.
AWESOMENESS...Thanks for posting!!!
If I were a cat, I would have trouble voting for McCain after that remark  (if you replaced "muslim" with "cat").  Mee-yow!
Have you heard about mixed martial arts Bruce Lee style? Well here's the story:  In the days before Bruce Lee an event such as the ultimate fighting championship would have been taboo. Read this article and find out why Bruce Lee may just be the father of mixed martial arts!
but there is a fundmental difference between the wartime actions of a democracy versus those of a fascist state.  the fascist state will have concentration camps irrespective of whether they are at war or not. democracies dont.  you could argue, for example, that the rounding up of japanese in ww2 was highly effective - as it made it virtually impossible for japanese agents to operate in the united states.  and thus they obtained far less intelligence.  in light of that , Gitmo is a less harsh approach.  the u.s. government could have quite easily rounded up all muslims in the wake of 911.  they chose not to.  instead you got gitmo.  like it or not - i think gitmo was the most humane option available at the time.
Now kick the filthy piece of shit back to his native shithole.
This explains why so many people have taken up bicycling...
Boom goes the dynamite.
back to Hawai'i. The world still passes through there, all the talent, all the artists, all the whatever will eventually show up at your doorstep. Perfect weather, excellent health care, pure water, both in the ocean and potable. So many races that bigotry is minimal compared to most everywhere else, and I've been around some.  The main drawback, island fever. Too much paradise eventually bores some people to death.  Don't forget the best surf in the world, and the prettiest women....ahhhh surfer girls.....
These days a man can't write stuff on the wall without attracting a grammar Nazi!
Unconditional patriotism and blind patriotism are both silly/stupid, whatever you want to call them. What he's saying though is that they think the ideals it was founded on should be relevant to it's current politics (presumably because they're generally good ideals).  Abandoning a democracy because it isn't working feels uncomfortably like quitting. Besides, by leaving versus quitting they could potentially be leaving the country to become insane(r) and even more apt to randomly invade countries.
I will go further than the previous poster.  They have left the planet.  It is a form rapture for them.  
and that guy's name was.........wait for it.......Rashid Khalidi ... /queue hamster drama music
simple: jews steal land, kill palestinians with modern american weaponry - palestinians are being oppressed on their own lands thanks to US' blind backing of israel who makes life as hard as possible for palestinians, hinders them to go to their worship houses, to reach hospitals in time etc. palestinians get upset and since they don't have all those fancy weapons supplied for free from the US, they throw their shoes in desperation, the only "weapon" they have at that moment, coming out of a mosque after a prayer.
Seeing as how it's pretty shitty right now I think the odds are good that it will go up regardless of who wins.
at this point, it's really only news if she gets something right.
My email to Immigration Minister Senator Chris Evans:  Senator Evans,  I appreciate that Australia has limited resources and that as a community we must be wary of welcoming in individuals who are going to take more than they can give back however I believe your dept's understanding of Down Syndrome is outdated if you believe that Dr Bernhard Moeller's son Lukas falls into this category.  While many people with Down Syndrome may not go on to have a career and pay taxes, some who are more high functioning, like Lukas, do work and often the jobs they do are hard to fill because of the tedium of the work.  Others who don't work often play a special role in the community that doesn't have a dollar value.  They are helpers and friends and many are volunteers.  But this aside, the good Doctor, his wife and his other child all seem to be capable and willing to give back to this country and given the fact that we in Victoria, like most of the country, are in desperate need of doctors who are willing to roll up their sleeves and get their hands dirty in the less glamourous areas of the country like the Wimmera.  The lives this man could save and the provision of services in this area, which would reduce complications and the need to send patients to Warnambool, Geelong or Melbourne WILL save far more money from the public purse than what would be spent by a person with Down Syndrome.  The decision to deny the Moeller family perminant visas is down right foolish, no matter how you slice it.  It is foolish from an economic view and it is foolish from a humanitarian view and worse, as this news is picked up by social media websites all over the world it makes Australia look foolish, selfish, heartless and not a destination worth visiting.  So please, Senator, reconsider this decision for the people of the Wimmera who are desperate for a doctor like Dr Moeller, for the Moeller family who came to the lucky country looking for our famous fair go and for the people of Australia who hope to hold our stead in the eyes of the world and their tourist dollars.  Sincerely,  &lt;my real name went here&gt;
If you've just spent 4x10^63 days of computer time to crack a password and you find out that the password is a phrase about being permissive re violation/penetration, well, I think that counts as [irony](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/irony).  I do not think that word means what at least one of us thinks it means :)
&gt; What is being a "leader" in the Ruby community about? To a lot of people, it's about the dollars.  To the rest of us, it's about writing solid code that other people use. Chad has done this; Giles hasn't yet. Chad's unintentional put-down hit a nerve, but I think it's more about the prestige than the cash for Giles.
clear your nytimes cookie
&gt;Tell what to them? That they have no influence on their government?  Um, look up Solidarity, the Orange revolution and the Non cooperation movement and tell me these people weren't able to influence the government of the day.
Palin: "I only shop at  thrift stores."
Religion is always the butt of jokes here on reddit.
sounds like a plan. just gotta dodge them pesky pirates...
Exactly.  Treating gay people as second class citizens is just like Hitler. In fact, murdering thousands of people for being gay is just like Hitler.
Most Americans did sit out in the civil war other than the south which was mainly fought by southerners, which included black southerners. If you look into your history you will find that most of the North's army were immigrants that were told they were going to be sent back if they did not sign up to fight the North; so they faced either signing up or starving on a ship voyage back home. The North won the war through sheer numbers and using immigrants as cannon fodder, I call in the American way, we have such rich tradition in fucking people over. 
Can I get that on a bumper sticker?
If they don't infringe copyright, I don't see anything wrong with it. P.S. Apple is evil**er** than Microsoft. Just look how they do everything to lock their customers in.  Apple's also copied a lot of stuff from BSD to make their Mac OS X, without contributing anything useful back.
Snailmail Netflix is a great service, but screw them on their botched streaming. I can watch Hulu on any platform, at a very watchable resolution, and I'll expect the same from YouTube as resolutions improve. But Netflix streaming blows, even on Windows. Silverlight? Pfft....
&gt;Most scholars, however, define the Holocaust as a genocide of European Jewry alone,[4] or what the Nazis called the "Final Solution of the Jewish Question." Taking into account all the victims of Nazi persecution, the total number of victims is estimated to be between 9 and 11 million  Wiki  And the holocaust is openly taught to be a myth in many Arab countries.
Calm down, skippy.  The only reason I said it was *my* reddit is because *I* created it.  I would welcome participation by others, but no one seems to be willing to do so.  No one posts, and only a few people even comment.  How, exactly, is that my fault?  I'm posting profusely to "seed" the reddit with some content.  I'm also trying to find links from other sites, since the non-participating lurkers need variety, and I'm actually *trying* to grow this reddit. 
Fuck that, there, I said it.  I want a nice long shower sometimes and the hippies can fuck off about it.  
Bzzzzaashhh.  There. Your eye's all gone, now.
He's a relativist. That's like my mortal enemy. You know how Hitler hated Jews? Well, not half as much as I hate relativists.
I've seen a lot of racism and hate via Palin rally videos.  The hate groups are having their work done for them.  Just two examples of many http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sIgv992NZs0 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KjxzmaXAg9E
What the demon says in the church performance does not equal what the church says or believes about the girl who was raped. This particular quote would align with what you said in your first comment, that demons lie to you. Assuming a spiritual realm to be real, this guilt and shame is also part of what the final scenes of redemption and freedom would deliver the girl from. I went to a church that put on these Hell Houses and I can definitely say that there are aspects of the performances that are easily misunderstood (and inherently flawed) because it is a complicated message and it is easy for people to confuse the message of the taunting demon tour guides with the message of the church. It becomes even further confusing when articles spin the headline to sensationalize it without any semblance of journalistic integrity and despite the often public mission statement of the church that is handed out in line that clearly explains the stance of the church.
[Enjoy, my friend](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=k4dN7j1hYaI&amp;eurl=http://video.google.com/videosearch?q=big%20black%20dead%20billy&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-).
Just dont try to argue with her she will bring you down to her level and beat you with experience!
And from seeing quite a few shops in my time.
Well did you know that quite a few number of books believed to be accurate accounts of the holocaust, were later exposed as being works of fiction and were only written to make money at the expense of other peoples suffering.
The right angle is when the nature of transactions are changing (between businesses and labor) we must let it play out.  How can anyone say good/bad? By looking at History. Hoover raised the tax on those making over $100,000 in 1932, and the nation sank further in to depression. This never works.  How would 20 percent unemployment not effect all?  Because productivity would still provide food, shelter, entertainment and all the qualities of life for the remaining 80 percent.  How are Obama's policies different?   Here we have to extrapolate a bit because his record is thin. That isn't a shot, just a factor of his age.  I believe that Obama's policies are much more far reaching in terms of increases in taxation and regulation, coupled with a lack of understanding of free trade and the public debt. These things all conspire to push him further to the left economically.  Keep in mind about  40 to 50 democrats in the house are currently blue dog fiscal conservatives.  Another large block favor free markets and progressive tax rates, coupled with lower cap gains taxes. Obama doesn't appear to support this new ideology sometimes referred to as the third way.  
Learn to spell "finalized" already, you filthy English kniggits!
According to the OED, it can actually mean any of 'one' (archaic), 'two or more' (legal), or 'more than two or three.'  The common usage definition, though, is "4. As a vague numeral: Of an indefinite (but not large) number exceeding two or three; more than two or three but not very many. (The chief current sense.)"
Anybody who's not a closeted moron knows this.
Individually-sized public transport will fail. What's to stop vandalism, defecation and other unspeakable acts inside the pods? Sure, that happens on trains and buses too, but far less often than would happen if you rolled this out in a big way in a metropolitan area. You need groups of people because eyes deter crime.
Yes, I agree: she is dumb. However, she is Alaska governor and candidate to USA VP. How did she get these positions?
Are you from the Bible Belt?  Pick up a science textbook.
Similar story- we got 12 friends from the apartment complex together to go to Ultra 7, not planned at all. We rented a huge passenger van, drove from Dallas to Miami in 24 hours, got straight out for Ultra, went to the beach the next morning, and drove right back that next day.
I think we all know who hes talking about. lol he might have been better off if he made up a name.
Obviously you don't know about the joy of fat sex.
I have four cats.  All of them are indoor cats.  It doesn't take much work to train them to stay indoors.  The lifespan of an outdoor cat averages about 2-3 years.  The lifespan of an indoor cat averages about 17 years.  It's not cruel to keep them indoors, you just have to make sure they have enough stuff to keep them entertained.  If you let your cat outside, and it gets killed, it's YOUR fault.  Not someone else's fault.  I feel bad for her that her cat is dead, but she should have kept it inside.  You can train a cat to stay in the house.  You can't train one to stay out of the road.
The number one lesson in business: delegate.  Geeks suck tremendously at this, because they (for the most part) think very highly of their own abilities, assume they can do everything well and that when they fail it's because it's "boring", not because they're incompetent (at that particular skill, anyway).  Nobody enjoys doing 100% of what goes into running a business.  Guys who excel at sales -- a tremendously important part of any successful business -- don't necessarily love to code, either.  This is why you delegate.  Find someone who could sell your mother a pair of underwear two sizes too small and hire him or her to pitch your product.  If you can't get a guy like that on board, then your product probably sucks, no offense -- sales guys are good at what they do precisely because they know how to convince people to buy things, and if they look at your product and think, "I'll never be able to make a decent commission on this piece of crap," chances are you won't be able to either.  Similar logic applies to accounting and payroll -- you think you can keep your books and who knows, maybe with GnuCash and a bit of reading you can make a reasonable job of it, but once you have a bit of VC money an accountant who actually knows what he's doing will pay for himself, because managing money is hard and he can figure out how to minimize your tax burden, your wasteful spending, etc.  Despite what programmers seem to think, a good half of what goes into running even a software shop has nothing to do with software.  If you don't know that stuff -- and be honest with yourself when you make that assessment -- hire someone to do it.  It's a startup, pay with options, the sales guys get commission on the deals they close, etc.  Whatever you do, don't try to do everything yourself.  Specialization is important, and the time you spend trying incompetently to pitch your product is time that would be better spent in front of the computer improving it.
What like Puff the Magic Dragon?
Your chart fucking sucks
 From what I've read and history has shown, even before WWII, a lot of people disliked Jews and didn't bat an eye when they were beaten or killed. What Hitler said was not so shocking back then which is sad, I doubt people were so full of hatred that they'd kill everyone. Mass hysteria, lack of education (but not always, maybe lack or morals is more apt) and bigotry combined in a perfect storm of rage.
I was just being a dick, I know. I haven't had soda in months :) .
&gt;That's a classic "two wrongs make a right" fallacy. For instance, women get off easy on murder sometimes, but I don't want to let murderers go to be more "fair."   Nor do I, but there is a futility in punishing bad acts by MEN more harshly than equally bad acts by WOMEN.  It breeds jealousy, envy, and ultimately hatred  and distrust between the sexes.
"Palin" is just one l away from "pain".
You, sir, are my new God. Sam Kinison *and* a Chippendale's dancer. You should have played with your nipples. It's what Sam would have done.
Open minded, sure. Tolerance of others, sure.  Christians can be both these things and still believe everyone else will be punished in burning agony for all eternity for not joining thier club.
Maybe you should figure out how to use Google before reading the programming subreddit?
you sure as fuck better have gotten an A in that class.
They are reprehensible in showing a partial truth to focus on how much more polluting immigrants are in the US than in their own country. It's like saying that a good Mexican is a Mexican who stays in Mexico. More correct would be to explain that when immigrants learn the American way, they pollute almost as much as we do. Americans are the problem, not immigrants.
It seems like this charitable organization is not understanding that this money didn't come from drugs, weapons, black market sales and further more it seems that it doesn't understand that this money was given so that they could attempt to realize their own goals and not the goals of the ones offering it... although charity is all about the last point.
You're infringing reddit-man's First Amendment rights!
Stop wasting time reading dailykos bullshit and go vote.
He's good enough, he's smart enough and doggoneit people aren't flocking to him.  I'd vote for him, but am not a Minnisotan
More to the point, even if patents were gone, that wouldn't stop open source software from sucking.  I don't know of one patent encumbered technology that Linux distributions have refrained from providing simply because there are patents on them.  Yet still you can't get anyone to use it.
Yes the futility. What exactly does voting for a 3rd party accomplish again? Makes you feel good about yourself right? Makes you feel like you're making a difference right?   Yet nothing changes and the powers that control the country stay the same. Yea that sounds pretty futile to me.  Obama won't change anything but he's better than the other guy.
Excellent sentiment.   It was a meme that was affirmed by Malcom X.  For the constitutional purist, and electoral democrat it is the Golden Rule.  
thats a lot of flies :o
So you're asking for censorship ? 
Wow, she thinks her constitutional rights are being violated while it is perfectly fine for her to force women into having children they don't want. AWESOME!
why can't mormons send flowers?  /Cheers
Absolutely.  Since the text of the reply presumes that the reader cannot read/write Welsh, the translator is either an idiot or a dick.
Maybe they did. Congress is no more honorable than the Cheney/Bush administration. Are they going to put on a show for their constituents by acting worried and expressing regrets? 
Upmodded for your username, too
downvote for being so sure you would be downvoted.
Shame on you [Hershon](http://www.reddit.com/user/Hershon/) for hiding behind a new account!  **THIS IS BLOGSPAM.  IF YOU SEE ANYTHING FROM PEACHESBACKWARDS OR HERSHON, PLEASE DOWNMOD IMMEDIATELY**
Cool!
Intentially?
I think you're right... Dane seemed like he was lip syncing what he said at the end...  Donnie kinda sounds like Dane, but I think he sounds like David more.
Aren't we already $16billion in the red just for this current budget? Interest on the bond comes from the general fund, which already doesn't have enough money. It is opposed by many different city's Chambers of Commerce and also a bunch of Newspapers (except LA and SF). And it won't be done until 2030.   The National Taxpayers Union put the actual cost of the project at $81 billion--but just the actual cost of the mere $9.95 billion that Prop 1A calls for...when you consider principal plus interest, it is going to be $19.4 billion.  My election guide says it'll cost $1 billion per year, off set by ticket prices...based on Amtrak's current price of about $100 dollars (round trip) they'll need 10 million people to ride the train per year, just to break even. That's just about the entire population of Los Angeles County and San Francisco County. 27,000 people per day.  (the article you linked to says $55, apparently for a one-way ticket.)  It would need to be nearly half as busy as San Fran. Int'l Airport (22 million passengers per year). And SFO goes anywhere...not just Los Angeles.  Don't waste you're money.  Edit: Some sources for you...  [Ballotpedia](http://ballotpedia.org/wiki/index.php/California_Proposition_1A_(2008)  &lt;--add a ")" to the end of that url in your browser  [Howard Jarvis Taxpayers Association Report PDF](http://www.hjta.org/files/pdf/highspeedrail_prop.pdf)
Hush, you'll wake the children.
Here we go. http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/fractals/program.html  &amp;  http://thepiratebay.org/torrent/4473962/PBS_NOVA_-_Hunting_the_Hidden_Dimension
Miff away. Miff all you like. Do it, Miff.
Holy Asbestos Scare Batman!
I'm not mad at science, I think it is a very important part of our evolution. I think science will continue to evolve as we further define what life is, and isn't. I just choose not to place all of my faith into science, because it hasn't yet explained the most important questions that I ask myself. Such as, why are we inclined to look for reason? How does belief affect perceived reality? (Meaning if you belief the world is a good place, you interact with it in that way, where as if you believe it is a bad place you may be more inclined to interact with it in that way.)  What is the nature of the universe? Does life exist outside of earth? (I have faith it does, because we haven't yet 'proven' it)  Why are we inclined to love? Why are we also inclined to hate? You could answer these questions simply by saying they help us survive better by allowing us to group together, but that seems incomplete to me. Why is it that evolution seems to be driven by communication?   It's not science I have a problem with, it's the people who refuse any other options simply because science hasn't proven it. Actually not even, it's the people who disrespect my beliefs because they can't all be proven. It is the exact same 'us vs them' mentality that continues to divide us. 
First off you elect people that get to choose how to spend the money that tax payers pay to the government. So it's no longer "our" money, it's the government's money.   The system needs to be stabilized so people that didn't fuck up can also get credit.   I'm not happy about people, banks or anyone else being bailed out. But this is the **consequence** for electing Republicans. You and I will pay it just the same as everyone else. Imagine if the last 8 years had been with a Democrat in office and a Republican Congress. Do you think this would have been as extreme? Perhaps, perhaps not. In the end, in 2001 Bush inherited a country in good shape which he and the congress decided to take the ball and run with his "mandate". America voted for this again in 2002 and 2004. Somehow people expected miracles from the 2006 election.   We live in a reactionary society, not one that tries to foresee the problems down the road. I listened to Warren Buffet in the late 90s about the Internet BS and I listened throughout the Bush tenure as well. He's been spot on (one of many). The information is out there.
How funny is it that most Christians still believe in a white, blue-eyed Jesus. He probably looked more like Obama than the guy you see in most the pics and paintings.
it already is a compliment. god is a grade-a douchenozzle.
&gt;Besides, by leaving ... they could potentially be leaving the country to become insane(r) and even more apt to randomly invade countries.  That's a good point. As sane Americans, maybe it's our responsibility to stop the spread of crazy.
Get motivated, I'd like to read 'em.
Ah. Thanks for that.
Basically it means this: Martin Luther King and a variety of other incredible civil rights leaders did the very nearly impossible by securing civil rights for minorities.
Are you mildly dyslexic from having grown up in Indiana?
Thank god.
This article is talking about doing multiple things while you've *visiting* a file/project. But you can (and should) break these things up into separate commits.
Decided to run for public office and got my - our - asses kicked. 
Littlejohn is a cretin. He makes some pertinent points about the Beeb, but that doesn't detract from his cretinous-ness
Palestine and Iraq are the same as a camp where 100 out of 850,000 survive?
why is the US considered part of the west again?! please remind me, because i really can't remember anymore.
Maybe it isn't.  The point is that selling/foreclosing/whatever will not necessarily result in homelessness.  Or maybe I'm too ignorant on what happens after a foreclosure or bankruptcy.  My assumption is that if someone has a job that doesn't quite cover the $1500 mortgage payment, then that same job might cover a $1200 rental.
YEAH! What is with the two-senators-for-North-Dakota shit!  How is this representative democracy? It was a compromise with the monarchists way back. Rar!
Who cares, he can just take the other kids candy wearing that thing!  Who's gonna argue with him?
Dunno, Drudge is claiming more hits than WSJ on line...  But damn, it is so biased. Without the fun on reddit.  Scary that so many otherwise intelligent people get their morning fix there.
No.
In 2002 Poland only made one goal during the entire cup, against the US.
this could be an ad for drinking coffee!  look at her go!!!!
Imagine, the cheek of a Welshman to speak Welsh in his own country...  It's like those French people in French villages, you know they all speak American and are just pretending not to understand out of spite.
Good explanation, unfortunately if these are to be outreach type events, they should be putting forth a confusing message.  The Gospel is simple enough a 6 year old can understand and complicated enough that men and women spend their lives trying to completely comprehend it.
She'd raise my GPA...
You mean fascism.
I would shine a light on the 'good parts' if I knew of any.  Let the GOP shrivel up like a dried up worm on a scorching sidewalk.  **Let free people dedicate the next 20 years to eliminating the hideous scourge that is the reTHUGlican alliance of fear-mongering goons, convicted sex offenders, and pseudo-relgious wack jobs.**
Paulcynic, at this very second, your gf is probably thinking very hard of ways to persuade YOU.   Remember that in all probability she truly believes that if she doesn't manage to persuade and convert you, you will go to hell.   So we have two persons going into a relationship, banking on the idea that "things will be OK if I can persuade him/her to flip whatever beliefs and values he/she has right now".   I don't like the odds of that succeeding in the long run. 
why do you think cigarettes are bad for you? is it because they're natural? have less calories than sugar?  are fine for you in moderation?
How true, and man I have been looking for so long!
Because the downvoter can make use of his money by buying a clicker and using it on the downvote link.
Not voting for 3 hours while I wait in a line. I live near Oakland California. I'm expecting a long snaking line of young black people. Then go home and get drunk while I wait to see if my vote counted(voting against the norm. just to see if it counts)
Last word.
[Wayne Coyne](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wayne_Coyne)
Is Taoist considered a bad thing by many Marine officers?  The best martial arts teacher I ever knew (black belts in seven different arts, head of Ju Jitsu western North America division) was a Taoist.  Really nice guy, but if you want to fuck with him you better be backed up by a seriously dangerous gang.
We assume free will because to do otherwise would challenge much of what we base society on. Our justice system assumes free will when it locks people up for crimes... take drug crimes, for example. Heroin and meth... these drugs erase your free will. They alter the way your brain functions. Yet we treat people who are high on these drugs as if they possessed free will when they "choose" to continue doing drugs.  We assume that they made the choice to start... yet if all around them they see chaos and misery and deprivation, and they "chose" to be high most of the time instead... they haven't really chosen. They also cannot choose to stop on their own.  What of memory as it pertains to the formation of identity? I am, in large part, nothing more than a collection of memories of all the things that have happened to me. Memory is, however, a very faulty thing. People mis-remember events all the time... I've mis-remembered things too. I picked up some medicine from a pharmacy a while back. I called in to get a re-fill, but they said they didn't have me on record for that medication. I'd gone there many times for similar medication... I swore up and down that I'd gone there. I'd always gone there... I honestly remembered going. I honestly remembered picking up that particular medication there... but I hadn't. They didn't carry that certain brand, so I'd had to go to another pharmacy to pick it up. I'd forgotten... yet my mind had filled in all the little details and I remembered going... when I hadn't.  This happens a lot.  If our memories of ourselves are faulty... who are we really? What are we?  If our memories are faulty and our sense of identity weaker for it, and our sense of free will is not quite in line with the reality...  We assume things such as free will, identity, and memory are true and reliable because to do otherwise is to not only invite madness, but social upheaval as well. We hold people to far higher social standards of behavior than biology provides for...  That's my two ducats, anyway.
upvoted for the "dumbest thing she's said in 3 days." blast....made me laugh.
WTF... The only two russians I know are from Krasnoyarsk and Penza. What a fucking coincidence.
"Echidna"
i suggest "shit nobody cared enough about to put in the correct reddit"
How's things going now?
yeah, the dork side of the force is strong in him.
Let me clear things up.  You describe yourself as espousing "a particular school of economics."   The rest of us think you're peddling nonsense.  Suppose you came here and said that you have a message for us about economics from the giant green lizards from outer space who secretly rule the planet.  We'd think you're insane and not listen to you.  This is like that.
He's got both the pedo-stache and rapist glasses!
Where a president puts his d**k is very much more irrelevant that where he puts his citizens. 
Only if you're right on the coastline, or live in poorly-constructed housing (mobile home).  Other than that, it's just a matter of 1) if one actually hits us (they usually strafe us and we look outside at it and scoff, telling it "*THAAAAAT*'s no hurricane like So-And-So was...") and then 2) if you have a tree that's likely to fall on your house  Aside from that, hurricanes aren't usually terrible to most of us, we just kind of marvel at the weather and remember not to act stupid.  That's Darwin Award nomination season.
You'd better get your ass out of there!
Less QQ, More Pew! Pew!
Okay, in order to find out if you are correct, you have to first define libertarian. If you make it so broad as to include "civil libertarians" like, for example, the ACLU that conveniently ignores the second amendment, then yes, your statement would be correct.  Otherwise, you're saying that you must know libertarians that would disagree with his statement that an Obama or McCain vote would be complete capitulation, so please find a couple and link them here.  You can't speak in generalities like that and not expect Libertarians or even libertarians to get upset. There's a reason why Obama is going to win, but it's not because libertarians are voting for him, instead I'd argue it has to do with the lack of most brands of libertarian not compromising on McCain.  Even the left-leaning anarchists I spoke to at the Libertarian Party Convention this year despised Obama and what he means for this country.   When you dislike someone enough, it doesn't make sense to say "oh well they hate McCain more", no, I just don't like either of them and I'll have plenty of reasons to dispise Obama outside of his compromises on FISA, the Patriot Act, and government bailouts once his four years is up. All he's done the last four years in Congress is showed up, he's missed more votes than any other senator save McCain. This doesn't make him better, it just makes him also horrible for our country.
The United Stated GDP grows every time you make a tax cut on small business and corporate America. The reason is that small business and corporate America will both grow dramatically do to having more money to spend on growth. In fact our GDP has grown dramatically over the last 8 years do to the Bush tax cuts. I agree they are unfair in the fact they did not have more cuts for middle class as well as upper class, which is the reason McCain voted against the Bush tax cuts. It will be economic suicide at this point though to let those cuts expire and even increase taxes around the board on the upper echelon as well. You need to research your history so you are not doomed to repeat it. Look back into history and see what happened when Reagan slashed taxes after defeating Carter, it caused and instant boom in our economy. 
The first step in the cleanup will be to point out who the brain-dead ones are _before_ they get into office.
How can you really know this until you have tried it? And get a better video of it too.
There's already a way to equalize the votes. Why do we need another?
Oh so you call me dumb because I am American, I get it.  You didn't prove anything about my intelligence, you only proved what an incredible dick you are. "You know what's so offensive about letting Down's syndrome go unchallenged? It's the fact average people are severely mentally disabled compared to me. So to then tolerate people who are severely mentally disabled compared to average people ... Fuck, I mean fuck!"  This is just gold in the heart really.  What are you a Nobel prize winner?  I mean with that kind of attitude you should be right? 1. Not taking all variables into account in casual conversation, does not make one "dumb" it makes one "off guard".   2. Your IQ is not directly proportional to your intelligence.  In fact, some of the highest IQ's have the lowest ability to comprehend and work with in society as a whole... which is why MENSA developed.  A more true assessment of intelligence would look at the whole person including but not limited too inter personal skills.  In fact the 8 intelligences have been submitted as a more holistic approach to determining overall intelligence.  You may be brilliant in some areas, but a complete idiot in others.  Thus a savant.   3. So basically, you really aren't as smart as you think you are, unless you master the 8 intelligences.  By the way, I didn't apply for Mensa because I didn't want to waste perfectly good money to be a part of a club. 
I don't really like the making fun of how people look either, but anyone that is that fat and wears jeans that are that tight, needs some help.
What next, gassing five-year-olds? These McCain fanatics won't stop till every child is killed. 
i read that as "my kids get tased for being poor too"  i thought that things had got exponentially tougher than when i was a kid.
Oh wow, I kept waiting for the leopard to turn around and bite his hand off!  ;&gt;)
I know! Just as I was getting used to the front he turned around. Ahh! 
And school his kids while you are at it. I'm moving to the US soon. Gonna do a lot of breeding: so stop tossing it off, earn some money and pay some tax. I'll be needing it to fund my lifestyle choices.  Lots of kids, little work, less insurance.
CURIOSITY LEAD ME TO PURCHASING FINAL FANTASY 7 AND DISCOVERING THE PHOENIX DOWN FOR REVIVING CATS KILLED BY CURIOSITY.
That's not true at all. This is specifically a Welsh thing. Other languages in the UK don't appear on road signs.
***VOTE NO ON PROP 8***  vote no no no EDIT:  ***VOTE YES ON 1A*** vote yes yes yes
It's a shame for all the great stories here there are twice as many uninteresting "I blew some shit up" or "got drunk in college and picked a fight"... Yawn.
My school drama group once put on a production of [*Equus*](http://tinyurl.com/2fgxda). This was in the UK in the late 80s. I don't think it could happen now.
Dr. Paul is just a different flavor of right-wing nutcase.  He's right on some things, like denouncing the rest of the GOP thug squad.  He's wrong on what to do about it.  He needs to leave the reTHUGlicans before any sizable number of voters will take him seriously.  No matter what he does, personally, he's too conservative and too much of a wacky demagogue for me.
I read a MIT study that says that "tin foil hats" actually attenuate ( make stronger ) certain frequencies, these two particular frequencies that it amplified drastically are owned by the government, and private cell phone companies.
good
Being religious predisposes you to psychosis. Psychosis predisposes you to die. Where the fuck is the evolutionary advantage?!  &gt; I might simply decide to end my life  That reflects YOU and not your atheism. It also reflects the fact you're an idiot incapable of thinking through counter-factuals. Like the counter-factual that if you were religious then you would believe in an afterlife and you would be predisposed to believing it's okay to die so long as a priest waives the condemnation against suicide.  &gt; From a strictly rational perspective  This would assume that you are even capable of rationalism, something I strongly doubt.  &gt; such as the pain that you feel  If that's the only objective thing you can think of then you have a small mind.  &gt; the only rational reason to live is to experience pleasure   Confirmed. You have an insignificant mind and are worthless.  &gt; Morality doesn't exist in the universe  Confirmed. You have an insignificant mind. And are amoral and worthless.  &gt; it cannot be perceived.  Neither can atoms nor mathematics. And yet they exist.  I could find greater flaws in the tripe you wrote but I can't be bothered paying attention to it. I just scanned it and already netted this much garbage.
Ok, now I see why I misunderstood. I gave you the benefit of the doubt that your idea was at least plausible, but apparently you think someone might have the financial backing to make their own google street view fleet and go around snapping photos with their high-tech cars.  Considering it took Google [5/25/07 - 6/10/08](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Google_Street_View#Development) just to get a majority of major cities, I highly doubt anyone can do it all in a week. So fuck your crazy ass idea. Even Google couldn't do it in the time-frame you require! 
in this image children see 13 dolphins, while adults see a sexy image. It seems that childrens have no experience in sexy images, that's why the most obvious thing for them to see are the dolphins. Adults instead have dirtier (:P) minds and see something else. interesting experiment. 
So *that's* where Pepto-Bismol comes from...
It's the Loyalty Room, don't you know.
Indeed, yet very few states (if any) actually have ballots for the electors.  Many Americans are unaware of the indirection in the presidential election.  In fact, I believe the constitution only gives the right to the people to vote for electors, not the president. The electors are the ones electing the president. Alas, there is little information on those "electors."  I always found such a system fundamentally flawed and detrimental to a democratic process: Security through obscurity is never a good thing when it comes to government IMHO.
This is the anti-politics reddit and I like it.
There are more americans in prison now than the germans had then. The denial is the same the jack booted thugs have america just the same they now know dont let the bodies stack so high you dont know what to do with them the only difference.
Sorry someone downmodded you for a legitimate answer.  I upmodded. Though seriously, try having cystic fibrosis and relying on the ER. Eeep. I think there can be a lot to drive down costs through price transparency, but sometimes it seems like one of those things that all of society can benefit from, like public schools.
&gt; Loving vs Virginia has nothing to do with this.  Loving vs Virginia has everything to do with this.   In both instances, the courts removed a licensure requirement on the basis of the Equal Protection Clause.  (read the decisions, it's there.)  You can't claim one was valid and one was a hijacking by the judges.
Shhhhh reddit-bot is not smart enough to know that
I really hope that Erik doesn't overdo the banhammer stuff. I hate trolls, yes, but I don't want Reddit to become a homogenized community, and this has the danger of doing just that.
Um, once again: McCain would make shitty picks, but Obama will make EQUALLY shitty picks in other ways. It's a lose-lose, yet again.
It's really telling how much we've been harmed by past election "issues" that even with Obama's insane lead, we still think McCain will somehow manage to steal things.  Personally, I'll go out and buy an American flag if Obama wins.  The hard part will be finding one that wasn't made in China. :(
Um, I live in the city, so this is news to me. Wheat farmers just run about in wheat fields shouting "grains, grains, grains"?
Science Bless Germany!
Dr. Paul is just a different flavor of right-wing nutcase.  He's right on some things, like denouncing the rest of the GOP thug squad.  He's wrong on what to do about it. He needs to leave the reTHUGlicans before any sizable number of voters will take him seriously.  **No matter what he does, personally, he's too conservative and too much of a wacky demagogue for me.  RON PAUL IS A NUT.**
Idle tentacles are the devil's workshop. Just ask any sexy Japanese girl.
&gt;The Trojan horse includes rootkit elements that infect the PC's master boot record (MBR), the first sector of a hard drive. Because the hardware looks to that sector before loading anything else, Windows included, the Sinowal is nearly invisible to security software.   Banks running Windows. Wow!
&gt;Maybe people think building a Lamborghini is like driving a Lamborghini, but writing a program is like using Windows 95.  People have no idea what writing a program is like, and they usually understand it even less when they see us work. Sometimes it's cool being able to control what most people essentially see as magic, other times it's less cool that no one really has any idea what it is that you do or why you like doing it.  Also, from the site:  &gt;Currently, camp is far from complete, and is not ready to be used.  Yeah, I'm thinking that attracting users isn't their priority right now.
Is this a subtle statment that you have concluded nothing?
I weep with sympathy. Maybe he can sell one of his 14 homes.
Yeah, that is pretty god damned intense
FTA:  &gt; From the loftiest point of its roof, during precisely three and a half hours of each forenoon, floats or droops, in breeze or calm, the banner of the republic; but with the thirteen stripes turned vertically, instead of horizontally, and thus indicating that a civil, and not a military post of Uncle Sam's government, is here established. Sounds like the Stars and Stripes turned on its side.
That was my first incensed libertarian reaction too.  And it's true.  However!  This article is what McCain would *say* about Jesus' policies, not Jesus' actual policies.  In that sense, I think it's a win and an accurate depiction of the world.
We must end this before it has a chance to begin! Richard rides for Jerusalem next!
noooooooooooooo :( biel :(
&lt;must not click.... must.not.cl-&gt; Noooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo!!!!   
Sort of a weird question. I'm sure it's breathing. Or the time I didn't jump off that building. 
"Hey, what's in here...*OHMYGODHOT!!*"
For some this reason hilarious, I found.
Morons. Only one m. 
[you are right](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iwkb9_zB2Pg) 
Right, I think what people mean by "homeless" in this context is "no longer in ownership of a home" as opposed to "living under a bridge and smelling like old cheese."
I don't think opening up to markets that aren't on the same playing field is a good idea. A globalised company that uses near slave labour wages for manufacture vs a local company that employs local people. What is going to happen there? I don't think that the standard of living for the developing nation is going to go up, but I do think that the standard of living will go down in the newly opened developed nation. Of course the profits will skyrocket for the company, and historically they will pass these profits along to ... the executives.  Increased competition will come from regulations to ensure we prevent/reduce/remove monopolies.  The public sector needs to streamline their processes. Reduction of the workforce won't do this. Process analysis and strict deadlines would be a vast improvement over reducing staff.  As for education, if you want to target skills for industry then industry should be specifically taxed to fund this education. After all, companies benefit much more from a large skilled workforce than the worker.
up modded for making me laugh.
physorg is great!
I hope so.
It is not only the mindset of developers but also the totalitarianism of innovators, that keeps these things in place. To take two examples at hand, Plan9 and VMS both suffered from the heavy-handedness of the corporations that owned them. What if the Plan9 folks had simply put together a new kernel with stronger message passing and namespace control facilities, without insisting on their own variant of `C`? They could have slid it right under a GNU or BSD userland and we would all have it to play with. As it stands, the most useful thing for the greatest number to come out of Plan9 is still UTF-8 (we may see use of `9P` as the Linux port progresses).  It is a fact that garbage collection _is_ slow and is unsuitable for many things. Can we make it easy for developers to _choose_ garbage collection when they deem it appropriate? Then they will use it alot! If we force it on them and leave them no other options, they will turn away.
Shit. Ok everyone, when you see submitted to reddit.com it really means to politics.
I asked you to take the dick out of your mouth. Not put more in. 
Double cheese, sir, just like you ordered!
Fat bitch was just jealous
by the way...i should clarify...there is definitely self-righteousness and judgment in the hearts and minds of many of us Christians, and during the time I was involved with that church, I found it hard (in my narrow-minded worldview) to comprehend why people didn't simply choose to refuse the cardinal sins and be "perfect." Now, after a nearly wholesale rejection of the church I have basically realized that we are all just trying to figure things out and there is a lot that we can't ever know, and we just (hopefully) keep seeking the truth and figuring out how to cope with the realization that we can't know it all. So, while I defend this particular aspect of the hell house scene and think the article is crap for not pointing out (or recognizing) that this particular scene is obviously not representing what the church thinks, but rather, is obviously the church's perspective on how the devil taunts people...i still doubt the overall impact of these hell houses because they seem to turn more people away from the church. many journalists who write their assessment base their perspective on the opinion of protesters and hearsay and rarely even go on the tours themselves to have an actual firsthand account.
&gt;they don't support open source  Thats just false, i mean i agree that Apple is very closed off as far as their software and hardware goes, but saying they dont contribute to open source is a patent lie. Hell, they are one of the primary starters of Webkit...
Otherwise known as Alaskan Lesbians.
That guy really needed to get out more.
Relatively speaking, he may be more correct than you.   I'll be hearing back from you I suppose. 
Fake
Given the other comments here, you might want to add something to indicate that you are quoting.  A greater than at the start of each line of quotation, for example.
What?  I'm from the US.  I was considering putting in Eastern, but then I thought that I've never actually seen any evidence of any Eastern nation researching such subject.  Where is your evidence?  Or do you base your view on "where your from" like an ignorant nationalist?  Tell me, which patches of dirt are better than other patches of dirt and how can you tell?
Are you sure you played a game with this scene in it?  'Cause I was BEOND sure that this was fake, like 10 seconds into watching it. The creators must have been aware of the innuendo, there's no way, no matter what language they made it in...
That was beautiful.  Thanks!
They should know that the feelings are mutual.
Just in case you were wondering, the election is on Tuesday.
I don't dismiss the reTHUGs.  I actively work to further the distruction of what's left of the party of hate and fear.  The GOP should be destroyed like you would a rabid animal that has already snuck inside your house.  GOP = Greed Over Principles
They're just poll watchers, both sides do it.
nothing, unfortunately. Trying to get a job. Anyway, I agree that PA is pretty solid but there are still a lot of undecideds in PA that, from what pollsters have been saying, are likely McCain voters. I think he'll win it but I don't want to see it get close and therefore nasty.   He practically has NV, CO, and VA in the bag. OH is close but in BO corner and NC and MO are toss ups. Anyone one of those + PA and it's game over. The only path to victory for McCain goes through PA and that's why they are basically camped out there. That's why Obama has to keep his eye on PA at all times. 
I'm not concerned with your input any longer. edit: I was definitely tired of dealing with this child.
Erik is my Idol, or Eric Idle is my Role Model.  Not sure which is witch. Burn it!  
More on the POPS workaround to the Coulomb collision problem: http://www.lanl.gov/p/rh_pp_park.shtml
I would have sworn this was going to be a link to an Onion story. I guess Tom Lehrer was right when he said [satire was obsolete](http://www.avclub.com/content/node/22863).
Coming soon to a theater near you: "Cheetah's on a Plane"!  Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger and Jesse Ventura as passengers on an aircraft that is attacked by a hoard of Cheetah's who try to hijack the aircraft and divert it to Amazon.com. Cast as once mighty warriors who have been reduced to paper pushing governors of their respective states (California and Minnesota), our superheroes invoke the ultimate weapon - they TAX the animals to death and hyperinflate them out of existence!
&gt;Lady and Gentlemen, Reddit is back.   ftfy
Hell, I rarely hang out on Friday nights... anywhere I'd want to go is way too crowded, so you need reservations if you want to eat out, and that's always a pain in the ass with friends...  I much more often hang out on weeknights or on weekend days... it's just more enjoyable...  To each their own, I guess.
Are you the surgeon?
What's is your point?  McCain supports the progressive tax system.  He is just lying about it to try to win.  He is so rich 270k is nothing to him.  He had no problems in the 90s when that 270k did go into taxes.
The park is outside of San Diego (not the same as the famous San Diego Zoo).  It's an 1800 acre preserve with most of the animals running around outside.  It's as close to them living free as they could outside the wild.  I generally don't go to zoos either because the animals look so sad, but this place wasn't like that at all.  Worth a visit if you're in the area.
Exactly what I was thinking.  When I die I hope it'll be right after banging a really hot chick who's way out of my league, setting a world record at something that's not absolutely retarded like the number of marbles I can fit up my nose, being part of the group that is the first to down The Lich King, or being the first to catch a new unknown virus that's about to kill a huge portion of the worlds population.
They're staggered, so every two years, [one third](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Senate#Term_of_office) of the Senate is up for re-election.
"Godless" is not an insult, it's just a synonym for "enlightened". ;) Smile and say "thank you, I do my best".
The [evidence](http://www.boom2bust.com/2007/12/12/is-a-republican-president-really-better-for-the-economy/) suggests that the economy grows more under Dems than Repubs:  &gt; found that the Real GDP Growth Rate (annual average) was 1.9% for Republican administrations and 5.1% for Democratic administrations during this time. Real GDP Growth Rate Per Capita was .7% for the Republicans and 3.8% for the Democrats. However, the professor pointed out that the years comprising the Great Depression and WWII should probably be excluded from the comparison. So economic performance from 1949 (end of Truman administration) to 2005 was compared, which showed Real GDP Growth Rate (annual average) under Republican administrations now stood at 2.9% and Democratic administrations at 4.2%. Real GDP Growth Rate Per Capita was 1.7% for the Republicans and 2.9% for the Democrats. These results prompted Dr. Parker to conclude that “the economy has grown significantly faster under Democratic administrations, and more than twice as fast in per-capita terms.”
If you are scratching your head trying to think of some kids birthday ideas, take a step back and think for a minute like your little 'guest of honor'. Some of the best ideas for kids birthday parties come from the kids themselves!
That's something I think a lot of us wished would happen to them.  I'm really enjoying *these* type stories in this thread.
Doesn't have to be for defense, works quite well for killing your food.
Is this the First Fifth Third that folded? The reason I ask is because the Scottish papers were reporting that a branch by the Firth of Forth was in trouble.
Yeah, its David Cross.
URLifying phone number won't do anything to enable people to make use of the standard.  People have been able to use it since the tel: scheme was introduced in 2000, there was (and still is) no reason to do so. The strategy is applied everywhere and we are using Moasic over TCP over IPv4 over Ethernet.  I think Opera is the most mainstream browser that isn't a fork of Mosaic. Note the complete lack of public Hyper-G servers on the internet.  If something takes extra effort to do and nobody will make use of the thing, the thing does not get done.  People need a reason to do extra work. To rephrase the question, "Why should it have happended back in 2002?"  What is the point of doing it?  What extra functionality would be enabled if everyone did it? Doing something just because it can be done in the hopes of somebody eventually doing something with it is not the job of web developers.  That sort of thing is for bloggers, people doing web design on their own time, and researchers.
I guessed before clicking that this was a picture of a pumpkin eating another pumpkin.  ...I need to get away from the computer for a while.
Or *freaky japanese spirits and a mermaid*
The train is a good idea but it's a bad time to add $20 Billion to the charge card. I voted no.
Mom?
I love it how a bunch of couch potato think they are changing the world by posting on some obscure website and participating in a political circle jerk.
I think that sometimes it's important for academic institutions to have a mix of not just the learned scholar but also younger, more fresh-faced and often eager/passionate professors. I know that this is the case in the  U.K. where I know a number of professors at Russell Group Unis who are there almost straight out of Uni. Whatever anyone says people respond to different methods and demographics and Old != best professor.
New refrain for the culture wars?
If you kicked my windshield out with me in the car it woulda been your last spontaneous act. What were your friends followers pussies or what.
This video makes me really sad that I have a job and am too lazy for hobbies.
Fry their brains so it's tastier to eat?
Bush didn't give a hoot about the Constitution either ... and we paid the price.  We can't let that happen again.
In the riot option are the strippers the people performing the strip searches and rapes or the people receiving them?
Just hope your governor doesn't decide to not build it anyway, like Jeb Bush in Florida.
asshole
*Another* excuse?
Do people really just vote for whoever is top in the latest poll?  I guess it's easier than paying attention.
Coming from a first language Welsh speaker, that's actually not too far off!
That would be science and engineering...and math.
I manage a UPS Store. I'm there by myself all day with nothing to do, so I'll dick around on reddit or bring in a TV and my 360. I was absorbed in the satellite dish quest and wanted to beat it, so I locked up and stayed until I finished it.
"Frottage"
&gt; *"incidently by lending out their customers' savings."*  That's not how it works. They create money out of thin air based upon a fraction (9/10, usually) of their deposits.  If that money is then deposited in a bank, that bank's money base goes up as well, so they can then create more money.  And so on.
pretty much.
&gt;Manager of community, slayer of trolls. WTF? The only way to diffuse such subtle threats is to open a dedicated troll account.
agree, at least under both Bushes.
thanks for the advice!
The 1st of November at 12:00 in front of Parliament House in every capital city.   We need to stop this before it becomes a real threat.  Let's show Rudd that he can get fucked when it comes to restricting Australian freedoms.  I am leaving to go to the protests now, you should all do the same.  Everyone else please get the message out, because if it happens in Australia other governments will eventually try to implement it as well.
18 yr olds can buy a gun....   just not a handgun 
Downmodded for complaining about someone complaining about someone complaining about being downmodded.
I think we all know who he was spending time with. You know who I'm talking about.
I'll answer your questions in sequence. Why am I defending the idea to get compensated for something you develop and design? Because I think its fair for people to get paid for their time and ideas. I'm the type of guy that actually clicks on the "donate" button for the open source software I like. Likewise, you deserve compensation as a systems engineer. I think it kinda cool you don't demand more than your fair share. But if you didn't get your fair share, that would suck. What the fuck am I ever going to develop and design? I am published writer. Some things I released for free, others, I would hope to get compensation for, I don't want to starve.  As far as software goes, probably jack shit :) What authority do I have to speak on the subject?   I have no official authority to speak on this subject. Just sharing my opinion. What points did I make that I believe deserve respect? That not having patents can produce stagnation in some fields.   That people deserve compensation for their time to develop something.  At this point, if you honestly don't see any validity to any of my comments, continuing to argue our points directly to one another would be fruitless.   
Um, I'm not sure I get the first one. Is that water sports Darth Vader or????
I believe you, but with the model being suggested, Obama just needs about 40% of Kerry's white voter take.  I think (hope) that's doable.
Stereotypes.
if you're in canada, check superstore.  mine had a bunch of ea sports titles for the PS3 on clearance for $9.99.  sports games don't interest me so i didn't pay close attention to which ones.
You are still buying in to the right-wing smear that says our media outlets have a Democratic slant.  That is simply not true.  The vast majority of American media has right-wing slant, due mainly to who owns them... giant faceless corporations that nearly always have profit as their only real goal.  **Ron Paul is a right-wing nut.  He's more honest than most of the snakes in the GOP, but he's still a nut.  And he was a war-mongering goon for many years before he figured out he could get votes by opposing wars.**  **Why don't YOU wake up?**
That required proving?
Google was doing the first cities as a test, and expanded rapidly as they refined the process.  Now that it's refined...  Or just crowdsource it.  Get people to walk, bike, or drive their neighborhood and videotape it so they can review it later and not look so creepy.
In the land of the blind, the one-eyed man is king ... so Palin seems like a paragon to the uneducated churchgoing masses who are used to doing as they're told as long as it's a (self-proclaimed) "Christian" who's telling them.  Which is why she is not someone I'd want in power.
I just saw an Obama on McCain attack ad the other day.
I call bullshit. I've never seen someone give a selection of candy, and I've never heard of a kid turning down candy.
I'm hopeful that the republicans, after much soul-searching, will split up in to their logically-determined factions:  * Those who are to the far right, often aligned with the **Constitution Party.**  * A new party called "The Rabid Bible Thumpers (RBT)"  * The AWEE Party:  Assault Weapons for Everyone Everywhere  * Witch Burners for Ultra-Low Taxation of The Rich  * Old Style Republicans (GOP)  * **Racists** (GOP II)  * **Libertarians** (GOP III)  * Panhandling Former Republican Wall Street Executives  * The coalition of Mormons and KKK Members  (MKKKM)  * The Over-60 crowd of old-style, self-hating gays who will help root out the commies!  * Mindless Flag-Waver Against Jesus  * THE RPTC  (**Ron Paul** and his Two Cousins)  ---  Please feel free to copy and re-post the above.
Why would you even want to?  Protip: They are not attractive.
Edgar Winter Group.  Duh!
Animal is reserved for the Department of Defence
If you want to quote something, use "&gt; " (without the quotes), not "|". Or try reading the help link.
&gt;Her student approval ratings have risen considerably recently.  I'm guessing that's not the only thing that was rising during that performance...
I think I saw "Nailin' Palin" in there...
I'm Muslim and non-Arab. I linked to JFK's speech on religion and then quoted it.
&gt; it doesn't help much if the Cornhusker Bank of Nebraska is solvent while Citigroup and Bank of America are bankrupt.  Of course, if Cornhusker Bank of Nebraska was solvent five years ago, they'd have been bought by Citigroup.
Being hungry sucks more!
I'd say it's sad, considering Governments are getting pretty much unfettered access to all of that information.
It doesn't.
&gt; This duplicity is a political opportunity. Whoever wins on November 4 will have enormous moral authority. It should be used to call for a freeze on the dispersal of bail-out funds, not after the inauguration but right away. All deals should be renegotiated, this time with the public getting the guarantees.  Just one problem: the giant douche and the turd sandwich both voted for the bailout.
The point was more in the fact that Barack is going for a tax plan that spreads his own wealth. Philanthropical. (Is that a word?)
Hell now that they have how many billion of my tax dollars. They should have had to file bankruptcy like the rest of us.
I am published writer. I have to lol at my own mistake. Ha.  
Sad to hear.  He was on the Daily Show a couple of years ago, and was still as clever and lively as ever despite his age: http://www.thedailyshow.com/video/index.jhtml?videoId=115875&amp;title=Studs-Terkel
Not if Bush stays true to form, simply says, "See? Here are some pictures of their nukeular bombs", then proceeds to attack.
She's hardly a minority, and her "message" is getting plenty of airplay.  Fortunately fewer people agree with it.
She makes me want to bone up on my German skills...
ym
So True! They think they are born to Rule, being "Real" Americans.
I consider myself a moderate, but I think the issue lies with what you consider "high powered military-style". Teflon-coated bullets, folding stocks and pistol grips don't amount to that in my mind. Also, you don't mention any sort of target shooting as an acceptable practice. I don't want to have to kill something just to build up my skill. While I agree with you that some regulation is needed, I think the AWB's more cosmetic changes and bills like it push too heavily against civilian rights. I'd like to know it's difficult for your average idiot to get a M249SAW, but I'd still want to be able to pick up a cheap AK.
There is a difference, but it is not relevant.  Concentration camps, whether they are useful or not, violate the basic principles the nation was founded upon.  As Skinner described, the "best" government would be one where the government rigidly controls everyone in a box and engineers their happiness.  We have defined a nation instead based on principles of liberty and equality, EVEN if it might put us in danger.  The most humane option available at the time would be to treat the "terrorists" exactly like you would treat citizens who were accused of a crime with presumed innocent, speedy trials, etc.  There is no justification whatsoever to return to a state of liberty if a greater level of authority is allowed.  It will always be arguably safer for the government to more greatly restrict the citizenry.  Our nation was founded on rejecting this fact forcefully and requiring the nation to treat people justly instead.
If you vote for McCain you will have a female president in about 2 weeks, the man is already standing with one foot in his grave by the looks of it.. ;-)
The removal of paper money WOULD be a serious loss of freedom, because electronic transfer is controlled by central servers.  Without cash, how would you pay someone under the table? What if the machine doesn't work?  What if they turn off your card?  Total control.
I don't know what bank he uses but I get that through Charles Schwab banking.
Jesus was 6'2", with blonde hair and pale skin, everyone knows that silly :p
You're right, he was trying and I give him a lot of credit for making the attempt.  However, *that* kind of vitriol and prejudice against Obama because they *thought* he was a Muslim begged him (as a candidate who wants to be President over both Christian and Muslim Americans as well as everyone else) to make the statement that there is nothing wrong with being a Muslim in this country, especially since some of the founding members allegedly came here to escape religious persecution. Freedom of faith is something the rah-rahs of America like to boast of, and it would have spoken better of McCain to make that clear and that intolerance of anyone's faith is not something his campaign is based on.  He could have said that and gained a lot of respect, but he didn't, likely because he thought making that statement meant risking the loss of the crazy evang vote.  I agree that he tried to do the right thing in attempting to clear up the misconception about Obama, but that moment called for so much more.
Well what's the reason you're not using the politics subreddit? Surely it's a good one.
But you can *re*watch it. Go on, the damage is done.
Buried for being blogspam.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JoODv8LVib8
Many women beg to differ.
I'm generally unhappy with the way Barack Obama has never reached out to Ron Paul voters and brought up any of the truths Ron Paul speaks about, even though Ron Paul was the only Republican to [refuse to condemn](http://blogs.abcnews.com/politicalradar/2007/10/paul-wont-conde.html) Obama about the flag-pin issue.
World War 2 and the "war" in Iraq are incomparible
I think he's raping babies.
Morans.  Only one o.
I know I can't believe it either. Not a single US or Confederate flag in that entire picture. 
He should be banned.
This is even true for Windows (historically, at least). If your OS came out of the box that said "desktop," the server version is usally just a registry tweak or hex edit away.
What was the name of the band you started with the girl?
I always liked hay guise the best :)  tis #5 on ICHB :)
I dunno. Im ultraLib and I think fewer deaths is pretty good news.  That RedditMan guy DOES need to be force-fed a wheelburrow full of pelican dicks tho.
&gt;full penetration w/midget zombie centaurs  In addition to eliciting an actual LOL, I almost spit beer out of my nose.  Thanks for that mental picture...
I can haz... i'd better stop.
Ouch.  I wouldn't have.
&gt;Defining "fair" as "equitable outcomes for one or more parties" do you, or do you not believe in the concept of "fairness" and the pursuit of its concept?  No.  Because (1) there's no way to determine this as we all subjectively value different ends; and (2) an "equitable" outcome doesn't necessarily mean that it's a good/decent/not terrible outcome.  Someone could kill both you and I and say "see, I provided those two an equitable outcome."  Of course, definitely not a *good* outcome for either of us.  Also, someone else had to determine what's "equitable" for us.  &gt;I'm talking about labor as commodity and its inherent iniquity.  I don't think it's inherently unfair that the one who pays all the overhead costs, labor costs, and takes all the risk, etc. derives more benefit than someone who works for him, at-will.  &gt;This holds true only so long as all parties are of equal bargaining power.  There's no such thing.  Someone always has leverage.  &gt;handicapped players are forced to accept terms they would otherwise reject if they held equal bargaining power.  Force implies violence.  Voluntarily accepting a deal that you think should benefit you more, doesn't equate to force.  Or even approach equating to force.  &gt;Maybe you're right. Would you indulge me and explain a little more?  Coercive means the use or threat of physical force.  Necessary means something that must be done (such as eat) or experience "bad" consequences.  Necessity can (easily) exist without force.  &gt;In such a case, the idea of "mutually beneficial exchanges" becomes a laughable farce.  No, it doesn't.  Because even if you don't like the terms of the deal, you can walk away.  But if you engage in the exchange, you benefit in some way, even if the benefit may be less than you like.  &gt;"[There is] no essential tie between the use of free markets and private ownership of the instruments of production."  Yes, there is.  You cannot exchange "public" property and a free market is nothing more than:  *the free market is an interconnected web or lattice-work; it is made of innumerable parts which intricately mesh together through a network of producers and entrepreneurs exchanging property titles, motivated by a search for profits and avoidance of losses, and calculating by means of a free price system.* ~ Rothbard  &gt;"The advent of socialism may not necessarily alter the underlying dynamics, provided that market competition or its functional equivalent survives."  This cannot occur while the State owns the means of production.  I see this statement as nothing more than an uniformed and unsupported assertion.  &gt;Libertarianism is a political-economic philosophy and not a purely economic concept.  Actually, it just means "belief in liberty."  We can apply it to politics and economics separately or together.  &gt;No discussion about economics is complete without at least a cursory understanding of the political culture in which it exists.  I disagree.  You can understand how a market functions while abstracting away from politics.
just one of the millions of random camwhores. i've seen better.
Democrats tend to bring people together.  Republicans have always been the party of 'divide and conquer' at least in my 45 years.  You just don't realize how screwed the Republicans are, especially as long as they have Ron Paul to 'help' them out.
I didn't know that was dane cook. I feel so used.
OK, I haven't heard of them but I will read up on them.  I hope I'm not going to find tales of modern societies which were under pressure from nations with ICBMs to act in a more civilized manner, that would somewhat undermine your point.
Also, this is more so the type of stuff I was thinking about when I originally made my comment, check it out. http://paultan.org/archives/2004/12/05/china-pirates/ 
It's already dividing.  The traditional conservatives are distancing themselves from the right wing nut jobs.  It's about time.
I DID prove that you're dumb. You also HAPPEN to be American and Americans are mostly dumb due to severe brainwashing. And your denial of all this is ... because you're dumb. Well, I shouldn't have expected you to understand a logical proof. Let alone one that was threatening to your ego.  &gt; What are you a Nobel prize winner?  Spoken like someone who has never and will never do anything creative in their entire life - you confuse external artifacts with internal being.  &gt; does not make one "dumb"  It makes "one" dumber than me.  &gt; Your IQ is not directly proportional to your intelligence  Oh for fuck's sake. You're too dumb to know either what intelligence is OR what IQ is. Here, [read this](http://www.reddit.com/r/environment/comments/7a9uf/onethird_of_world_fish_catch_used_for_animal_feed/c063pfi) it's very short. Then you'll be able to understand that intelligence is just memorization speed and capacity. Which is exactly what IQ measures. Analytics and synthesis are what really matter and I've got both of those in spades. I'm not too shoddy in intelligence either.  &gt; the 8 intelligences  Are a bunch of fucking crap.  &gt; you really aren't as smart as you think you are  You would really like to think that, wouldn't you?
Or stop purchasing anything from their sponsors. Their idiocy is kinda funny in a pathetic kinda way.
I know I've seen this around a bit, but I still don't know where this is from.  Where did this meme come from?
yeah, it gets complicated when we fall back into pride and trying to be perfect, then screwing up, feeling ashamed, hating God because he has given us impossible rules to follow in asking us to be like Christ, and then walking away completely. obviously other people believe different things, label this belief an opiate of the masses, a fairy tale, etc. and of course, as an inquiring Christian i go through these same thoughts as well. i have just simply found that the somewhat rare instances when i get away from technology for a bit and set aside a day to seek God and try to listen, i usually experience something. maybe i program my brain to do it, and it just works because i think it will, but if that's the case, it beats whatever else i convince myself to be true. alright, i wish i could unlock the mysteries of the universe in the reddit comment thread, but uh...time to go drink a beer?
Tom is exaggerating, she only took 30 minutes in the bathroom.
How old is that kid? 21-22? I'm sure he has a poster of his hero Limbaugh in his bedroom at his parents house.
if there were no more starving children, they'd be out of business
Having spent 18 years working for a charity I can tell you that sometimes you have to turn down a donation because your other supporters are bigots who would STOP giving if you TOOK the donation.  I suspect this was something similar.  $17K is not a particularly large donation and it would only take offending a few large donors for the charity to lose more than they gained.  Yeah, it sucks.  Yeah, it seems bigoted.  But, yeah, it's the way the charity game works.
It expresses who I believe would be best suited to be president.  That's what elections are for.  You're not betting on a horse, you're voting in a democratic election.
What's this I'm feeling?  Could it be jealousy?
I don't know why you got downvoted, because it is true. I doubt that's what she was actually saying though.
His point was; "But life isn't about having all the information up-front. Often you make your choices and have no idea of the consequences until much later. Fallout emulates this with it's game mechanics, and as a result it results in the world feeling richer and deeper."
Just another day in America..... and no comments from anyone.
The actions of the United States in both situations are not.
Good points, all. But I get the impression that Obama *gets* the problems he faces. His work as a community organizer tells me he *gets* poverty and how it affects people. His work as a constitutional lawyer tells me he *gets* how government is supposed to work and what American freedoms and liberties are and that they were hard-won.  I don't get that feeling at all from McCain. His flip-flopping tells me only that he *really* wants to be President. 
Yeah cause if you insult her or question the government she will probably shut the press down.
Does it matter?  It does sound like fun, though, whichever way it goes. This is going to be the bestest post-election event EVA! It's going to be a riot!
Hey, don't write us off completely just yet.  A country is always a lot more than the actions of a few mindless beaurocratic nongs.  To keep it in persective, the governments here generally don't bother us that much - I think we need to recognise that and consider ourselves reasonably lucky.   If you visit Aus, do it to experience the stuff that nature has provided here and nowhere else.  It exists on a level that has nothing to do with the government or in fact, the people in general.  Visitors from Europe and the UK are often completely unprepared for the sense of isolation and scale that is Australia.  Coming from the smallest part, the little island at the bottom called Tasmania, (slightly larger than Scotland in area, and with a population the size of one large English town, around 500 000) I can assure you that you could visit Aus many times before you die and still not see eveything you want.  But, thanks for your support in this important matter of overseas doctors.  I am amazed and disgusted by it. My guess is that a solution will be reached, but it's crazy to have come to this, along with all the negative publicity it generates.
Very nice link, thanks a lot :-)  Going (briefly) through the editorial reviews the book mentions a couple of things i already have read about, but it might still be an interesting read.
I too regret that.
I wouldn't, but if you did, it would be exactly the kind of lunacy that has made this campaign so entertaining.
I hate defending him, but he's allowed to say whatever he wants.
Seriously. WHAT THE FUCK. This is why America will fail. Why??? Because parents can't even properly train thier kids to shit. I mean, sure, I've never had kids, and I know its a tough thing to do.. MAYBE THATS WHY I HAVEN'T HAD ANY KIDS YET. Just think of all the crazy fetishes that kids that are forced to use that will end up with, seriously. I mean, who the fuck straps thier kid down to make them shit, honestly??
They have been thugs since AT LEAST 1972... they just kept it hidden a bit better for a few years.  Underneath the fluff and fanfare.. the GOP cares about two things:  (1) rich people and (2) bombing the crap out of other countries.
Or paintbrushes.  Physics-defying insta-platforms would come in handy for trying to cross the irradiated ponds...  
Jesus himself never said anything about abortion, but the Bible repeatedly states that life begins with the first breath, so presumably fetuses aren't covered under "thou shalt not kill", because by biblical standards, they aren't alive.
&gt; The bottom line is that I want things to be the same because identical output eases testing and debugging, and not because I care about the exact bit pattern that will be computed identically. So round your results to n digits. I'd love to see a realistic example of when this isn't sufficient.
I'd like to see China come get em...  
While I think the odds are stacked against this woman having a medical problem that makes her condition unavoidable, your statement is flawed in that food != calories.  It's entirely possible for a person to have a condition such that consuming only enough food for them to survive (with respect to nutrients) also leads to their carrying around a lot of weight.  Simple [genetics](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Obesity#Genetics) could put somebody anywhere on that scale.  To repeat, I'm not saying it's common.  I'm just saying that uncontrollable obesity doesn't defy physics -- in fact, it's a known phenomenon.
No matter where you look panic, poor republicanism during its epic fail.  Him and palin the very very best republicanism has to offer and the best it will ever and has ever had.
What's this? Penn State on Reddit!?   But yes, I agree that while the collegian may have a slightly liberal slant to it, some of the letters to the editor make me ashamed to attend this school.
I'd hit that so hard that she miscarries both her current baby and her retarded little 'brother'.
Ha, yeah don't know you after all - midwest but not Michigan.  I just like the term fuck head, kind of an interesting pairing. What genre of music was it?
Bush booby trappin'.
We leave those sorts of things to the private sector to sort out amongst themselves.  After all, Canadians want a safe and secure internet, shaped with Canadian innovative technologies.  I have been working with the CRTC to make sure that we can have a Made in Canada solution which guarantees a compromise between the only two interests at stake here; US network cartels and Canadian natural network monopolies.
That's crazy.  I was in Mary Gates and I didn't hear anything until hours later.
[by machocomacho TCS](http://www.dailykos.com/story/2008/10/9/174948/124/948/625526)  &gt;McCain will quietly serve out the remainder of his senate term in 2010, only from here on out, no one will trust or believe in whatever he has to say. Sarah Palin will either not seek re-election in 2010....
Yes!!!  Huge victory!  Now I can steal every idea and sell it for a profit and they can't claim that their stupid little GPL applies to me!  Yay!   (seriously, do you think before you submit?)
Fuck them both.
&gt; The top cruise velocity that can theoretically be achieved by a thermonuclear Orion starship is about 8% to 10% of the speed of light (0.08–0.1c).[4] An atomic (fission) Orion can achieve perhaps 3%–5% of the speed of light. A nuclear pulse drive starship powered by matter-antimatter pulse units would be theoretically capable of obtaining a velocity between 50% to 80% of the speed of light.  &gt;  &gt; Missions that were designed for an Orion vehicle in the original project included single stage (i.e., directly from Earth's surface) to Mars and back, and a trip to one of the moons of Saturn.[3]  &gt;   &gt; One possible modern mission for this near-term technology would be to deflect an asteroid that could collide with Earth. The extremely high performance would permit even a late launch to succeed, and the vehicle could effectively transfer a large amount of kinetic energy to the asteroid by simple impact. Also, an automated mission would eliminate the most problematic issues of the design: the shock absorbers.  &gt;   &gt; Nuclear fission pulse unit powered Orions could provide a fast, economical interplanetary transportation with useful human crewed payloads of several thousand tonnes.  &gt;  &gt; At 0.1c, Orion thermonuclear starships would require a flight time of at least 44 years to reach Proxima Centauri, the nearest star to the Sun, not counting time needed to reach that speed. At 0.1c, an Orion starship would require 100 years to travel 10 light years. The late astronomer Carl Sagan suggested that this would be an excellent use for current stockpiles of nuclear weapons. ...wow. If we had sent one out in the '50s, it'd have gotten there by now! WHAT ARE WE WAITING FOR.
Cover guy has nice nipples. :D
Facebook, isn't your 15 minutes up *yet*?  Twitter's waiting in the chamber, let's wrap this up.
What does that first sentence even mean?
Although I understand your point, I disagree.   1. Bush was not exactly elected in 2000 or 2004. Major loophole.
what? no "I'd hit it?".  Shame on all of you
FOUR LIGHTS!
And anyone have more information on: &gt; A nuclear pulse drive starship powered by matter-antimatter pulse units 
Yeah, it's a very strange perception, both because I've heard many survivors speak, and it's a reminder, and because my great uncle is a survivor, so in the knowledge that all of the survivors will be gone, is the future reality of his loss.
Even if Obama were a commie at some point (not that he was), he's now shown he's even worse: A reformed commie neoliberal.
i dislike palin as much as the next redditor, but her statement (although dumb), makes sense.  I think the headline is a bit sensationalist.
Touchy subject! But not every one who carries a child with DS knows about it.  I have a friend who went full term without knowing, and only found out at birth. It's possible.
Matt. 10:34 "Do not suppose that I have come to bring peace to the earth. I did not come to bring peace, but a sword."  Sounds like Jesus was in favor of preemptive war.  Maybe Jesus wouldn't have been such a bad GOP candidate.
Same here. Especially since that statement actually has weight to it.
And your *point* is...
The necessity of living in harmony in nature is the very basis of the philosophy.  Zerzan and Jensen make extensive and cogent arguments regarding this philosophy.  I'd be interested to hear your criticisms of their actual arguments.
No, actually -- I'm plain fucked up enough that I enjoy proving tautological statements.
an honest effort an hour ago from an honorable gentleman
Atheism is a philosophical belief and according to Kaufman v. McCaughtry (2005) it is entitled to the same treatment as traditional religions receive under the U.S. Constitution.
Does he look like a bitch?
Shouldn't that say "Libby"? :)
I'm sure that comment will cause a Grievous pun thread; you can almost Count on it.
and you didn't take a picture of his nametag? FAIL :P
It tastes like bad Cholesterol but it spreads like good Cholesterol.
You give me scores of laughter.  Have fun being a self important pompous ass, and while the world may fall in love with you for a while (eventually), the long descent will suck.  I just hope I actually get to know you and laugh when the latter comes true.
Maybe you should stop voting in Democrats and Republicans then?
You will get no help from the vast majority of Democrats in having the helping the rich, right-wing media give more airtime to a tin-foil-hat-wearing nutcase like Ron Paul.  He is actually a lot farther to the right than McCain on many issues.  And McCain is basically identical to Bush.  I think if you really believe in Ron Paul as you apparently do (for what conceivable reason I can't imagine) then you need to find a third party who will accept his particular brand of kooky moonbat theories.  Good luck with that.
You read so much about all these teachers having sex with their students. Now this.. and I'm wondering .. where were these teachers when I was in school? huh?
Like this?  http://3drockstar.com/wp-content/uploads/2008/10/3d_don_quxiote.jpg
The boy is seven not 21. 
It wasn't Janna, was it? Back in like 2002?  I always wondered what happened to her...
Because military people are smarter than McCain gives them credit for.
&gt;If you think McCain was intentionally contrasting Arabs with being decent people, you're misunderstanding the quote.   I agree he was trying to give a compliment to Obama, but can you dispute that in doing so, he insulted Arabs? Those two things are not mutually exclusive, and a simple Google search will show almost unanimous disdain for his comments amongst the Arab American community.   I'd like to put it back on you, and ask you why is it that of all people, Democrats and Republicans included, that Colin Powell is the only significant political figure to assert that it should not matter if Obama is Muslim or not?   My thoughts are Republicans would never say it because it undermines the portion of their strategy that wants to play into people's fears that Obama is a scary Muslim foreigner who doesn't see America like you do and is some how a threat to America.   Democrats would never say it because Republicans would leap on it as evidence that Obama really IS a Muslim, and all the other scary things about him must be true too.  Bottom line, it is yet another piece in McCain's strategy that I believe no one can claim is not partially based on the EXACT SAME thought process that makes Racism so powerful and dangerous. They may not call him an Uppity Nigger, but instead he is an Elite Celebrity-Professor type who thinks he is better than you. They don't call him a foreigner or outsider, instead they suggest he doesn't see America like you do, and he has ties to terrorists, he is a danger to the country, etc.  Fear of the other, fear of outsiders, painting him as a man of Mystery (despite two best-selling books), accusing him of palling around with terrorists, etc. would not work if Obama were a white Christian male. McCain's strategy is basically to be as racist as possible within the limits of Plausible Deniability and pray for the Bradley Effect come election day, and this quote about Obama being a decent man, not an Arab fits into that paradigm perfectly.   Your thoughts?
Maybe we could chance upon a declining civilization, remember what happened to the Roman Empire.
He's more well-known for his "acting". Just because he can write or direct is no reason for us to have to sit through his acting. He's only ever on camera because he's pretty.
...the snailly one.
I'm not sure if you're playing PC or console (so YMMV), but the load time for save games on the console is extremely short and I've found a pretty easy work-around.  * Find difficult lock. * Save game. * attempt to pick lock. * If you're successful keep going, if not, re-load the save file. * PROFIT! (for real)
Most Jews I know identify both as Jews and as citizens of their country.  I have no idea where you got this information about Jon Stewart and Bill Maher (who BTW is only half Jewish). 
Lol I know I was giving you a hard time :)  I'm just sick and tired of all these false accusations, that man will go to jail on charges that he had $3.2 million dollars worth of pot when really it was not more then $150k - $200k worth of pot. It's just bullshit, I'm not sitting by anymore.  For those "wait and see" types of people, they need to understand that just waiting to see what will happen wont do shit.  Take a stand fight back.
lol, it was pretty much just to use the word in a sentence for your amusement, which actually means my amusement.   So what is your problem with relativity? 
pity your cousin wasn't smart enough to COVER HIS WINDOW.
I somehow have more respect for these guys for at least being forthcoming with what they are doing. Sadly, this foreign policy is played out regardless of who is President. I don't expect Obama to be any different. Just not as ham-fisted as Bush was, or McCain/Palin would likely be.
Not a damn cleat in site.. pfft, amateurs.
18 year old Doug won't have been able to vote either, unless McCain starts the war almost immediately.
This is "look and feel", not design. Look and feel were deemed unpatentable last century.
you don't see many actual breasts do you?
Hmm...  You must be new, or not have been around for a while.  This will catch you up on Reddit, so far:  o  PAUL GRAHAM!!!!  o  RON PAUL!!!! / (I don't like Paul Graham anymore)  o  BARACK OBAMA!!!! / (Ron Paul is too libertarian/extreme)  o  ???????!!!!!  / (something like "Obama's fucking up")
I was shocked until I saw the .uk part.
(.)(.) wow
no logic right there... good job and thank you for proving my point which is that.. all the lefties on reddit showed up here about 1 month ago and 90 percent of them 'know' one single thing about ron paul, he's a wacky demogogue deregulator.. get a clue you guys are acting no better than the ones you call 'rethuglicans' (neocons i call them) and you need to be smarter than that.
Well that definitely makes more sense :)
That kid doesn't seem so awesome.  The video does contain a kid's awesome mech costume though.
Great story.  As I was reading it, I was thinking you were growing up in the 70's - that's how it was for a lot of us then as I recall.  We didn't go hunting, but we did go fishing, dug clams and picked oysters to help out with the food budget.  And to try to make a little extra money to get by we'd sometimes go out on weekends into the woods and pick ferns that we sold to a florist supply. I too am outraged at the idea that people who over-consumed and got themselves into too much debt  could end up being bailed out by my taxes.  I have no debt.  Our house has been paid off for a few years now, and I've been driving the same car for 22 years. 
As long as Erik sticks to spam-trolls, I think I'm fine with the Ban-o-rama.  
And yes this democratic congress was a disappointment in many ways.  Don't you worry. If Obama falls down reddit will be screaming about him.
so hot
Organic canned food has the same problem.
another collective statement
I've lurked around reddit for ages without an account but the responses in this thread just pushed me into finally registering. Democrats - more importantly the country - are going to get nowhere by blindly directing their neocon hatred (however well justified) toward whatever rises from the ashes of the current Republican party.  Yeah I'm incredibly angry too but we have to step back and look at the patterns here, look beyond this election.   As we speak there are many thousands of Republicans trying to change the party from the inside because the system is rigged to shut out any third parties from gaining meaningful political strength.  Realrepublican is right.  And to read some of these attacks on him is frankly bewildering and severely shakes my faith in America's ability to ever break free from this nightmare of a partisan mindtrap the country is stuck in.
It is not Senator Obama's responsibility (nor the Democrats') to rebuild what's left of the festering pile of puke that is today's GOP.  But, good luck with your tin-foil 'crusade' there, Mr. Paul.
Hell yeah!! I once paid $30.00 for a gram, thats when I first started smoking. Find me someone that will pay $50.00 a gram, I'll show you free money and an idiot.
We're not talking about Dole/Hagan - I was responding to a video rgladstein linked to, regarding a debate in Alabama. 
She's got sexier moves than most of the professional strippers I've seen. Amazing hip gyration. &lt;3
I don't like what you are saying, because I fear that you are correct
I would very much favor an approval voting system.  A popular vote system would still result in nothing but Democrats and Republicans trading positions and voting identically.  They have to be taken out of power or at least have the threat or they will never stop usurping more power from the public.
Thanks, America, for pissing off another 19.4 million people.  When does this end??
&gt; But corporations, though they may seem evil, are not necessarily so. The people who run them are just very, VERY disconnected from the rest of the world, so the effects of their actions are of little to no concern to them.  Which is why, IMO corporate person hood is dangerous and absurd.  Corporations get to enjoy the benefits and protections of the Constitution, but under a whole different set of laws and with virtually no moral, ethical or criminal penalties.  If the fine is less than the cost of compliance, it's good business.
it might be the drink, but that made me laugh. just the look of pleading on his face... and those soul-less eyes behind him.
some friend of Matt Harding ?
Why couldn't Hagen run an ad accusing Dole of being brainless?
Holy military batman!
Other holocaust survivors also waited a long time before publishing, not as long as this though. Wiesel waited 10 years. You come along with zero facts just really shitty circumstantial evidence, as opposed to Israel's holocaust museum which published the book.
Good we need more people policing the new's. The more emails the better, not just more emails to this station but to all stations around the country that display this sort of idiotic propaganda.
and where exactly have you heard this story?
*All* rights are *inherently* coercive. You have a right to life, but that requires coercing others not to kill you. You have a right to free speech, but that requires coercing others not to shut you up. You have a right to property, but that requires coercing others not to steal it from you. You have a right to pursue happiness, but that requires others not to hold you in bondage.  Who coerces others to not infringe on your rights? 
Funny, one my of gay friends actually voted yes on 8.  He just doesn't want the special attention, and he's OK with the state if civil unions. .. go figure
i fully realize you expect these people to go away after obama wins and you POSSIBLY have a supermajority, but you guys are dumb for thinking that there are no relevant parts that msnbc and democrats can work with, bad move to dismiss your enemy this way. it will come back to bite you guys in the ass if your policies don't work.
I typed in 'Palin children' and this was the fourth link http://www.rhrealitycheck.org/files/images/Palin%20and%20Trig.preview.jpg  I can't believe you actually believe Palin is a bad mom because of one event you recall watching. I mean, dear lord, I remember Michelle Obama parading her kids around during one of their rallies like she was a fucking trophy, but that still to me is a far frigging cry from "poor mother". Anyway, there's a picture, and it didn't take me more than four seconds to find. If you looked yourself I'm sure you'd find plenty more.
yeah, i really want to watch the show sometimes but they should find some other host. obnoxious is the right word
I believe some of those guys are members of a Toronto based martial arts performance team called Team Ryouko. Check out some of their vids. They are pretty amazing.
Yeah, not only did I miss your point, but I actually missed this response.   &gt; The one thing that bothers me about atheism, is the lack of acceptance for those who do believe in spirituality.  I suspect your gripe is with certain atheists and not with atheism, but point taken.  You were downmodded pretty heavily for pretty much saying the same thing about "science", before clarifying that you were being specific about the people who are only interested in science ("materialists").  Anyhow, just to clarify, I don't think anyone's beliefs are wrong, as long as they don't state them as facts that somehow impinge on me.
Upvoted for nihilism!
I say make the minimum fighting age 91. You've got way less to lose at that point, and it would be exponentially more entertaining. Besides, 91 year olds have way better things to do that fight in a war. Like hitching up their pants and telling stories that go nowhere. As a result, there would be peace and boredom on earth. 
Me and my wife already did.
Remember Erik, to conquer fear you must become fear.   Therefore, to become a Slayer of Trolls, you must become a Troll yourself.  I shall forever think of you as the Not So Dark Knight.
with bare feet on broken glass.
Are those Mormons at the end? o_O
Ken's a slut
leave her, save yourself, and your spawn from stupidity.
? what?
Actually an interesting distinction, not just semantic wrangling for propaganda purposes now that I think about it.  Republicans in recent years have been asking that you do what they say because they're in power, and putting the security of the government and stability of the country ahead of the rights of the citizens.  That constitutes "ruling."  Whereas governing is directing administration to best help everyone, even if the government is shortchanged in the process.  Would never happen under a monarchy, for example, because the people with the power are the only ones with the ability to determine what gets done and they have no incentive to be "nice" beyond their personal honor.  
"It was a million-to-one shot, doc, a million-to-one!"
I hate Dane Cook.
**Well, now maybe you're getting taste of how liberals have been feeling for most of the past 25 years or so.**  **I wish the GOP and their phony flag-waving, choir robes and moralizing mixed with airport hand-jobs a fond, fond farewell.**  **May the reTHUGlicans rot in hell.  Have a nice day.**
"There are only two kinds of languages: the ones people complain about and the ones nobody uses." – Bjarne Stroustrup
damn. makes me want to slap those "ohmigod, the line was sooooooo long, like half an hour, so i left" whiners even more now. 
Boring.  Courtney Love's done this already.  
WHERE'S YOUR GOD NOW!?!?!?!
SUNDAY SUNDAY SUNDAY!!!!
See, I have no problem cracking down on hard drugs. The type's of drugs breaking up families and tearing apart neighborhoods. They should change to "War on hard drugs" Or something, this is just stupid. I'm for the war on drugs, but only on what I think the war on drugs should be. Things like Meth, Cocaine, Heroine, Pill Poppers, and the drug companies. Their should be more regulation and more people to help stop the abuse.  Marijuana is not a drug, it's not chemically made, it's grown from the ground along with Fruits and Vegetables.  Marijuana would do nothing more but bring the family together.   Try a Vaporizer, it's extremely clean and just amazing. 
Nice, though his math is a bit of. He neglected to account for the money made from the extra seats. If you've got 30 rows with an extra seat per row, that's 30 tickets you didn't get to sell before.
"Hey Kenny"
try having your birthday today like me.  everyone is celebrating halloween rather than celebrating my awesomeness.  halloween fucking sucks.
In my linguistics class we talked about how the nobility of old decided that Latin, being dead and unchanging, was superior so they started enforcing Latin-based rules on English, e.g. "no splitting infinitives".  People tend to forget how arbitrary language rules are. Grammar is supposed to facilitate communication, not hinder it.   ... and I'm not even an English major.
But can people reply? I know google has had a webpage for a while that would let you send a message, but it just used the e-mail gateway of your provider...
Is it too cold for you?
Sad he didn't make it to Tuesday.
Er, what do you want sort of work do you intend to do with this new computing device? Personally, I'd love a Sun T2000, but, then again, I don't do a lot of floating-point work.
The next serial killer has been thwarted --good for them.  Poor croc, 20 years of community service is quite fitting.
The current historical era has been dominated by the "eternal war on terror".  The "eternal" part was the pretext for Cheney and Rumsfield, who along with Oliver North, had developed plans to declare martial law, take over the United States, through some "catastropic event" that would provide that pretext (REX-84). 911 was that pretext. the pretext for passing the PATRIOT Act, the Military Commissions Act, Northcom, HR 1455. The war on terror, the modern war on terror, finds its roots in the Palestinian/Israeli conflict, dating from the time Israel, for lack of better term, invaded Palestine and began the process of stealing more and more land until, Palestine was but a memory. The worldwide muslim reaction since that time is nothing more than blowback, with the radical islamic movement (Arafat was secular) starting when the Mullahs and mosques were the organizing centers for the revolution that brought down the American puppet, the Shah of Iran. Chritisna zionism, joined Hebrew fundamentalism, and zionism are mere counter-reactions. Abundant personal experience is how I know Reddit is owned and operated by those "liberals" who are progressive in name only due to fact that all criticism of Israel is immedidately repudiate via "0" karma scores; all blogging about doubts about the offial 911 scenario are met with ad hominem attacks of "conspriacy theories" and "tin foil hat" rebukes.
I was wondering that, too, but that can't really work. Masturbation takes me about, I don't know, 5 minutes TOPS. Childbirth takes...? A bit longer.
I.. er.. you can't connect the dots here, really?
Even Freepers have sworn off API, and everyone knows those people are gullible nuts.
"Do you want the man who picked Palin picking the court?"   That made me shudder.
I was thinking the same thing the entire way through. I was in awe at how he joked around with someone I'd happily punch in the face as talk to. And the final product was much better as a result. Kristol let down his guard enough that we could see more of what he was really thinking, even though he tried valiantly to maintain the GOP talking points.  But Stewart is using logic and an incredibly sharp mind, along with a refined wit to perform this. You can't really expect that from O'Reilly, whose grasp of logic is rather faulty, or completely disingenuous. 
And with that, I am getting off reddit and calling my mom. 
well, if you're going to throw off the yoke of repression, at least do it by the standards set by Mr. Webster...
It was the Victorians - they essentially invented tourism, and the daftness that comes with it.
defeat drudge? does anybody here pay attention to reality?
Wrong freeway. The NAFTA one is I-35.
inflatable octopus? :)
&gt; Now to wrap this complex series of facts together: do quakers/amish support people who carry guns and fight/kill other people? Yes.  I don't know what nation you live in, but in mine the people with the guns force you to pay taxes or go to prison for 20 years.  Taxation is theft. Not complicity. The taxpayer is the victim here. Just liked the raped. The occurrence does not imply consent.  &gt; But if that's two complicated for you, how about the nice, easy fact that Amish people slaughter their own pigs?  That's provident living in the sense it is more humane than nearly any other way of acquiring meat, as well as self-sufficiency and part of an overall healthy lifestyle.   ...   &gt; Or the fact that if you tried to rape a Quaker guy's daughter right in front of him, he'd come at you with whatever fucking weapon was at his disposal?  &gt;&gt; "As we were **standing next to the body of this 13-year-old girl**, the grandfather was tutoring the young boys, he was making a point, just saying to the family, 'We must not think evil of this man,' " the Rev. Robert Schenck told CNN.  &gt;&gt;"[It was one of the most touching things I have seen in 25 years of Christian ministry.](http://www.cnn.com/2006/US/10/04/amish.shooting/index.html)"  Like the people that held a vigil the day after a gunman killed ten of their children? Every one of them related to multiple people in the community of 300 people? Like the man who stood over the dying, directly over the body of a 13 year girl and warned the other children present not to feel hatred ... Those Amish?  The point isn't, will people practice self defense in a fight or flight situation? The point ... the title of the submission ... pictures "a world without war." Violence in this instance is not dressing an animal, or defending a teenager from a rape. Don't be crazy. :\  &gt; Homo sapiens is a violent species.  Only a sith deals in absolutes.
no idea what you are talking about, stay away from politics, too bad there are too many dismissive democrats that are gonna give your 'party of all people' a bad name... come back from the left just a little bit and realize this isn't going to be a one party system... anybody who doesn't know that there needs to be a balance between left right and libertarian is lost in this discussion and doesn't see what could be dangerous when that balance is effected.  Why they dont' i'll never get, we just had the republicans in power forever and look what happened, there needs to be balance don't you get that?
Says who?
No, I am simply saying to you that Alex Jones did not just think this up (which you probably base his nuttiness on); he got it from a Chinese newspaper.  That's it.
i'm a cactus!
Hum... I didn't know that. You taught me a good lesson. Does this apply even with encrypted SSH logins ? Then, are identity files more secure ?  I will need to research this in more depth (but I just tucked my little one after a candy grabbing orgy that Halloween usually is. I want a warm bed)
I live in Georgia. What I may do is go and challenge anyone who challenges anyone else. Game theory, FTW!
Just means Jesus was aware of the perception of a messiah.  Most wars are over religion.
Dear Pxorp,  Welcome to American politics. Most of it is fake and a lot of the politicians speak in code words. It never means what a simple parsing of the sentence indicates. Politicians use weasel words so that you can read pretty much anything you want into their statements. They don't even care if they're caught lying; if they give a sexy smile and are allowed to pontificate until everybody gets bored Americans will forgive them and move on.  And if you believe most of what you read here, then you are being spun more than a 65 lb. female midget straddling an oiled sumo wrestler cowgirl style. Enjoy the imagery. I am.  Sincerely, American Politics
my $0.02 is worth less than your $0.01
The kids gave up Halloween when all the grownups started celebrating it. I would too if I saw my Dad drunk in a monkey suit. 
There are many inexplicable events in nature, yet few are captured on film. This is an affecting series of images documenting a pair of swallows: the healthy bird's attempt to save its mortally injured and dying companion. 
Fear 
You can't use a word that's already appeared once!
fox news is right wing, msnbc is left wing give me a break, you aren't paying attention, basic people don't read the newspaper.
"The public sector needs to streamline their processes. Reduction of the workforce won't do this. Process analysis and strict deadlines would be a vast improvement over reducing staff."  Public sector employees have no incentive to reduce costs, or improve quality. The only way public services will improve is to introduce competition.   I'd say this can best be done by removing the public sector from service delivery - public services funded by government, but delivered by non-government actors.  "As for education, if you want to target skills for industry then industry should be specifically taxed to fund this education. After all, companies benefit much more from a large skilled workforce than the worker."  This is drivel. Tax payers are already funding education from 5-18. The results are not good. The problem is not a lack of money, it's that there's no choice. Bad schools don't close. The public sector is run by public sector employees, with no power, control, choice in the hands of the parent/children. That has to change.
The flights were half empty.
Wow.  Stand back and think about this.  She can speak ONLY by choosing icons which other people choose for her.  How would you feel if your only method of expressing yourself was through a set of icons that your parents choose for you to express yourself with?  Well I guess they'll never have to worry about her disagreeing or having unapproved views.
Check out the interview of some of the guys in the video. They really are an amazing performance team.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5xM7fTdkO-E
Nope.  I had to wait till about 27 before it'd fill in properly.
what did they say?
Sarah Palin!  Sarah Palin?  Sarah Palin.  Sarah Palin.  Sarah?  Palin?  Palin!  PALIN! *~cough~* Wow, I've been saying that name for months.  I just got stuck.  Yes, I'm sure we'll return to the usual Reddit Madness. 
&gt; collided several hundred thousand years ago  ... &gt; The system is located about 300 light-years from our Sun  Ok... so,  to simplify,  300'000 years ago,  300 light-years,  flying at about 1/1000th of light speed,  i.e.,  about 300000 m/s,  or roughly speaking 600000 knots -- reasonably feasible -- we should expect the first ships of refugees any time soon now,  shouldn't we?
That's awful! When is the rest of the world going to smarten up?
sans-serif is the best, it is cleaner   bookmarked
"To the "Gay vote"... many of THEM wish THEY were you, but that's another rant."   That line earned the article a little orange arrow.
YaY!  Reddit returning to normal from the election overload with a lovely Scientology/Cruise/corruption story!  It's like the first Scientology story I've seen hit the front page in weeks. 
I support marriage for anyone who's brave enough to want it. Even strange love is better than no love. 
Target practice for fun is hardly a civil right, unless you believe in vigilantism, or in a right of revolution.  I don't see that either is protected by the Constitution.  Recreation with deadly toys is a reasonable thing to regulate.  You may or may not agree.   By the way, all the "AK" variants are high powered military-style weapons.
I did appreciate that he felt Olberman was over the top,and that he called Obama out for his FISA flip flop,and others. Then he will go off on major personal attacks . This entire article is a series of attacks,a response to a joke line,a joke he did not like,I guess. http://www.salon.com/opinion/greenwald/2007/09/05/hemingway/index.html  Review of his book Dean Barnett The Good, the Bad, and the Greenwald Literate insights, occasional distortions, and forays into ugliness. http://www.weeklystandard.com/Content/Public/Articles/000/000/014/993axicw.asp?pg=2  one of the most easily and profitably ignored voices in the blogosphere http://corner.nationalreview.com/post/?q=Y2RjZWE5ZWM2YjhiMTYxYjMxY2NkMDJmZjg2YWMzOTM=  Michael Rubin notes Glenwald just making things up about him,beginning with personal attacks and not bothering with homework,or facts http://corner.nationalreview.com/post/?q=NWZiZTk2Y2NiMTc4ZDMxMWEyM2ZlODU4YmMzMmE3OWM=   The worst of it to me is he routinely misrepresents what people say. Now,he is free to do that,there is a lot of that.   I just do not bother reading anymore,I cannot depend  on it being straight up. 
i haven't heard ron paul say that in his speeches, where did you hear that?  
*How* does this douchebag still sell his halfass music?  fixed that for u
I think you've mis-interpreted some of what's in this thread.  I for one DO HATE Bush, but it's not just a position I dreamed up one day.  I am literally BANKRUPT from his policies!  I have been vilified by Bush and YOUR PARTY for about 30 years and I'm sick of it.  I like Senator Obama quite a bit, but I would have voted for a dead water buffalo over any reTHUGlican.  Your party approved torture, sent over 4,000 young people to their deaths based on phony 'intelligence', lied about both of these things, and in currently question the patriotism of others.  If you want to be taken seriously and have any political clout ever again, SWITCH TO A DIFFERENT PARTY!  It doesn't have to be the Democratic party... but dump the GOP.
Fuck that. The Cloverfield monster is just a republican ploy to suppress voters. You have to stand up to the man and stay in line.
I especially liked the shot of the two pot heads at 1:07, trolling Usenet no doubt.
It's neither. 
http://z.about.com/d/politicalhumor/1/0/I/Z/bush_jesusad.jpg
how so?
Write to her and let her know what a racist nutbag she really is:  info@michelebachmann.com
wow
If. Caps. Lock. Is. Cruise. Control. For. Cool. Then. Single. Word. Sentences. Is. Cruise. Control. For. Annoying.
fuck you asshole. if you ever went to prison for a crime you didn't commit, or your son did you would be fucking pissed, your life ruined. You are a complete moron. No wonder it's so fucked up everywhere.
"A Paramus teenager learns first-hand about the **lack of** separation of church and school"  Fixed.
I'm gonna be on him!!!!
Its not that great. Mostly, its just cold and dusty.  We did do it next to the old archives of the Economist, though, which is weirdly arousing for me. I put the used rubber in a binder of 1967 issues.
Hear, hear
It was official a long time ago.
Greasemonkey and: http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/36335
Well, had he perhaps chosen a better running mate...
Apparently, he will do neither of those.  Instead, he will come to reddit and blame us for his party's faults and diseased thinking.
Athlon X2, with as much RAM as you can afford.
Very true.  Corporations are not "evil", it is hyperbole for people to refer to them as such.  They are concentrations of power formed for the purpose of further power acquisition. To me the best metaphor for modern corporations is to think of ancient greek gods.  People worship their iconography throughout society.  They are powerful but not omnipotent, work together when it suits them and fight one another when it doesn't.  They become vastly more powerful as more people convert to their faith, but weaken and die out when forgotten. They place value in human lives only insofar as those humans are of utility to them. Human beings mostly will do whatever corporations tell them to do, they can't fight against the gods unless they have other gods or some powerful titanic force to aid them.
Her looks comes to mind.
Video. Game.
Ugh, THANK YOU! I hate that!
Just watched in Utah.
One of the best interviewers of all time. He made people comfortable enough to become very personal and I think that is something we need to strive for as a society to be able to solve our problems.  Edit: 'And They All Sang' and 'Working' are very leveling.
I wearing a red diaper and shag carpet samples while I type this.
Clinton's [surplus](http://www.letxa.com/articles/16) is false. 
Part of the GOP strategy is to repeat falsehoods over and over. They know that people will hear them enough times to think that they heard them from several sources and must therefore be true, without really remembering the source and context. That is why McCain and Palin continually stated known lies, even after being told to their face that we knew they were lies.
Does anybody know the presidential pardons Bush has given?
He crayoned it on his ass
OR HAS IT?!!
Well, there IS Skull and Bones...
No hard feelings, obviously. :D  You're right, it is with more 'materialists'. .
The mind boggles.
I like turtles.
I imagine the Who probably had a lot of experience with herpes as younger men, so I trust their opinion on this matter.
Why don't you Ubuntu users voice your opinion?
I am incredibly sad because that name is too awesome to not be in active use.
Where the fuck is the dark side in all this?
I want to not work while not worrying about food and shelter (which is my definition of retirement).
Reminds me of this:  http://languagelog.ldc.upenn.edu/myl/TranslateServerError.jpg
Where else would you suggest?
definitely, a wealthy business owner never sacrifices.  oh wait.  they sacrifice almost everything so that they can earn more money and live a better life.  most business owners are this way.  the ones you HEAR about are the ignorant heirs and irresponsible owners.  most of them really are fine people.
We liked to pair classic rock style riffs and indie rhythms. came out sounding like a modern day Beach Boys. It was interesting, though. We never really covered too much, just made up our own music, which is probably why we never got real popular. No one knew what we were playing.
Yeah, but I think it might be because you used too much of the actual song.
[here you go](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0TLA_f7S0cw)
Buy local. Buy in season. Buy directly from farmers. Don't buy pre-prepared crap.
If you don't like being lumped in with goons, offenders and wack jobs, (I assume that's what you meant by that incomplete sentence), just dump the republicans.  It's really that simple.
Yes, if you have nothing to say, attack your opponent ;-)  I'm still waiting for an explanation.
also, [votes are stolen](http://baltimorechronicle.com/080304LindaSchade.shtml) and [people are blocked from voting](http://news.google.com/news?q=people%20blocked%20from%20voting&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wn)
&gt;"This individual does not speak for the campaign" Who *does* speak for the campaign?  Self-mutilating-chick doesnt speak for them, paid staffers dont speak for them.  Havnt we even seen instances where Palin doesnt speak for them?  Does McCain even speak for McCain?  Or is this just a plane without a pilot?
Good answer.  Another way to say it is that both parties have members that the rest wish would go join the other one.
LOL, good one.  No, her parents don't give her access to icons that consist of disagreement or anything like that.  She's going to be happy, agreeable, and completely neuter for her entire life!  The perfect child!
as opposed to the prevalent theories that just destroyed america, the constitution and the economy and voted to give 700 billion to rich people?  Got it... lol
70's
you're
If heroin is an orgasm in a needle...bacon is an orgasm in a pig.  Wait..that didn't come out right.  Damnit, there's another one...
Because they aren't being paid to do it the right way?
I wrote this because I wanted to test out skein, a SHA-3 entry by Bruce Schneier. Rather than write by own "sha3sum" program, I decided to use md5sum because it's flexible enough to use any hash function.  I found out that all the SHA-3 entries are (supposed) to supply a header file that provides a common interface, so I could write a function that would use that interface, which in turn would be used by md5sum. I'll add more entries to this collection as I find and port them.
Who said the FED orchestrated anything?  
no.
Yeah, sure, he fell on it.
In short, they are dicks. 
Liddy's just bitter because Bob has to take Viagra before he can stand to deal with her.
Fly, baby, fly!
why does it really matter?  do u believe she isn't old enough to decide if she wants to take naked pictures of herself?  (maybe she didn't mean for them to be all over the internet but that's a different story)
While I applaud the general sentiment you seem to be espousing, I take issue with your assertion that you can label the principles in your first paragraph like equality before the law, etc. as 'American'.  I may be misinterpreting your intent, but these principles are not the sole domain of the USA - these are general, universal principles of justice and human rights.  The usage of the terms 'American' or 'un-American' (or in my own country's case 'Australian' or 'un-Australian') to refer to particular attitudes or behaviours related to universal principles like justice and human rights is arrogant regardless of whether they're used in the McCarthyist sense or in the sense that you argue for.  No nationality has sole claim to these principles: behaviour that violates them is unjust, not un-American.  I'd also call you up on your analysis of why McCarthyism was wrong.  It wasn't just because he and his cronies used the deceitful techniques you described - even if he hadn't lied and had genuinely, honestly and lawfully found 'reds under the bed!!', he would still be wrong.  It is a universal human right that people be allowed to adhere to any political creed or ideology that they wish.  Communism, socialism or any other 'ism' should not be criminal: the only things that should be prosecuted by the state are actions, not ideas.
Note that Jews did not choose to be Jews, but were killed for it.  If the Allies decided that nothing short of painful death will scare people away from such atrocities in the future, then maybe they were justified. The Nazis and Sympathizers *chose* to support the Nazi death machine.
I wonder what they substitute in their melamine?
I see the humor in this as well. But can someone explain the purpose of user-agents and what disallowing them actually means? I mean Pedophile and kiddie porn would make a good user-agent and disallow combo but how does it all work? 
Rounding up of Japanese-*Americans*, please.  Not to mention Muslim-*Americans* in your example of how merciful the US government was in the wake of 9/11.
It's *Were and Peace*
I would pay to watch that.  EDIT: I Did. In one of the Jenna Jameson videos, her hubby is done up like a zombie.  Jenna loves Bella, I think...
Did you know they're now putting serial numbers at the base of all condoms??  No???  I guess you don't roll them down that far......
 I know of no reason  Why the voter fraud season  Should ever be forgot.
And if McCain wins and then dies, do we want PALIN picking the court?
Seriously though, it's unlikely that Cheney's health is good enough for him to occupy his current post, let alone accept a new one.  He had quadruple bypass surgery 20 years ago. The only grafts commonly known to last 20 years or more come from the mammary arteries, and there are only two of those. This means that at least two of Cheney's bypass grafts have already well outlived their expected duration. And this "expected duration" is for people with ordinary jobs and ordinary stresses.  If I were a betting man I would bet against Cheney surviving his job as VP for more than a couple of years. [He's already experienced irregular heartbeat twice in this past year](http://www.boston.com/news/nation/washington/articles/2008/10/16/cheney_treated_again_for_abnormal_heartbeat/).
Don't you think that executing people who are accused of interfering with an election could be considered interfering with said election? 
Executed? Does George Bush get to decide if Obama interfered?   Summary: Hell no.
It is highly likely to trend sharply away from that direction after five days or so. 
Amen. Elizabeth Dole was one of my female role models. Her work on the Red Cross was inspiring.  After this, I will no longer be able to support her. 
I get the feeling from that response that you would fear the singularity
You have about one more year before you can give up hope. But!... Be glad. There are people who have WAY too much hair, and have to shave twice a day. Facial hair is nice, so long as it's neat and trimmed. A shaggy, all-purpose beard is not the way to go.
Well, that kitty took a mighty fine photo. He's just a regular Ansel Adams! He deserved the top photo prize.
I'm hopeful that the republicans, after much soul-searching, will split up in to their logically-determined factions:  * Those who are to the far right, often aligned with the **Constitution Party.**  * A new party called "The Rabid Bible Thumpers (RBT)"  * The AWEE Party:  Assault Weapons for Everyone Everywhere  * Witch Burners for Ultra-Low Taxation of The Rich  * Old Style Republicans (GOP)  * **Racists** (GOP II)  * **Libertarians** (GOP III)  * Panhandling Former Republican Wall Street Executives  * The coalition of Mormons and KKK Members  (MKKKM)  * The Over-60 crowd of old-style, self-hating gays who will help root out the commies!  * Mindless Flag-Waver Against Jesus  * THE RPTC  (**Ron Paul** and his Two Cousins)  ---  Please feel free to copy and re-post the above.
Just heard this one Fox, so sorry for no source.  edit://Perhaps I posted this for the wrong crowd...
This sort of stuff shouldn't happen anywhere, and it's particularly shameful in a vibrant democracy like India.
Not much destruction, but damn impressive piloting skills.
I see a 404 not found.
Dude's name is Chris Mark. Part of Team Ryouko. The guy is crazy with a bo staff
I'm not a shoulder to cry on
yeah i have that video on my hard drive...
turning blue?  it's been blue for awhile.  only outlier polls showed as a serious race.
*cruise ship captain enters; dances*
I like the picture but the headline doesn't make much sense?
&gt; That certainly applies when I want to get something on the web  Which is exactly what I was looking to do at the time. I wanted to build a site, and I knew a little HTML from a personal site (things like Friendster &amp; MySpace, wayyyy before it was ever on the map). Python being a general purpose language not necessarily relegated to web programming, I probably wouldn't have installed Python and starting doing stuff not relevant to what I wanted to achieve.  &gt; I don't want to get into the debate what language would actually be better  Pointless. I pretty much hate PHP now, but I did start with PHP. I never went to school for what I did. When I was about 16, I was trying to figure out what I wanted to do with my life, and with web programming, all that limits you is pretty much your own knowledge. This was very, very attractive to me, and I immediately decided to do it. PHP being the powerhouse and one of the most known ones (seriously, go to a book store), I started with it.   And I don't really regret it, learning the inane-ness of that language has helped me come to grips with pretty much every other language after it.
Hilarious, for reasons I have yet to find.
You know what **I** hate? Possessive "its" spelled with an apostrophe!
&gt; The idea that trolls are always wrong is a logical fallacy.  That... depends on your definition of 'troll'. 
Okay guys, I was just joking, lol.
I didnt even know it was still on...
Yeah, alot of the stuff in the article isn't specific enough for us to know if they have or have not actually stolen any design. You don't think something shady happened with GM's Spark being ripped off by the Chery QQ? Is that really just "look and feel" going on?  I kind of assumed the blogger was correct that the laws are different in China.  If that happened in the US, I wouldn't be surprised if it was illegal. The audi logos are trademarked.  The compant that ripped em off didn't even spend money to design a LOGO. Ha.   
He's got a sense of humor and that's about it.
[proof that 1+1=2](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:Principia_Mathematica_theorem_54-43.png) and there were 356 pages in the Mathematica Principia that were **needed** before this proof could be constructed.  Apparently, it's really hard to prove 1+1=2 logically. So I'm guessing the same is true for 1*1.   Now, I haven't got the first idea how one goes about doing this. But if it took a couple of crazy smart dudes 357 pages just to prove that 1+1=2, then who the fuck am I to argue?
What about the war between India and Pakistan?
Oh oh, another right-wing wacko latrine scrape.  Check this out instead, these guys aren't worried about more important things:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vFM1xqqTX_g&amp;feature=related
Who said America is stupid when you had to correct them on something so trivial.
War it a good book?
face it...except for those who explicitly voted against this damn thing, they are *all* complicit in this deal... we, the People, need to hold them accountable...bring them to justice...in the courtroom!... peace...
I cannot wait to hold a gas station with one of these.
The election has not even started yet and he is already trying to lower "expectations"?
Guess we'll see in 4 days.
i'm bankrupt too because of him, but leaving the republican party is dumb in a rigged system.. that's the point, the dems are gonna be in power and need to help shine light on the good parts of the minority, ron paul, in a rigged system its that or a possibility of the nut jobs like palin gaining a minority and if things go wrong for the dems in the next 8 years people will be just as mad and go back to what? Palin?  no, ron paul has to be the guy, i'm just warning you guys if you love this country to prop him up he's a good guy and not palin or rove.
http://www.lust-for-life.org/Lust-For-Life/NoneDareCallItConspiracy/none-dare.html
I drove 30 minutes to go early vote yesterday (I have approximately 586,204 jobs and have no idea what my schedule will be on Tuesday), stood in line 2 hours, then had to leave to go to work.  I'm going to set an alarm to be sure I'm up early enough tomorrow to actually make it through the line.  I'd like to think that the number of people early voting in Ohio means that election day will go smoother, but I have a feeling it is just a sign of what a total mess it is going to end up being.
No, this doesn't really make sense.  Eighteen-year-olds should be allowed to buy guns/beer/etc whether they vote or not.
That's true.  And most of those quoted in the roundup are interested parties -- lobbyists and attorneys who have a stake (as of now) in seeing the standard change.
Now it's our job to spread the word, far too many people believe this crud. And purging voter rolls is far far worse.
And your point is?
If they join the army, they can get a handgun too.
true but they can help. it is not their direct responsibility, but it is their INDIRECT responsibility.  they have the power to shine light on Paul's reason and dismiss the idiot crazies like palin.
Reagan: No. 42 of 43 presidents, inaugurated within weeks of his 70th birthday.  Bush: No. 43 of 43 presidents, inaugurated relatively young, I'm not going to bother to look it up.   Doesn't look like much of a correlation to me.
To quote a famous person, "You betcha!" 
That depends... we will either have rainbow hairdos and lollipop smiles as we guffaw and wipe away tears about those crazy Dubbya days, or the internet will be shut down and we'll all be on chain gangs.
BUDDHA-BUM-TISH
Funny? Reddit.com?
Awwww :(  
I've noticed those lately. Can you explain their significance? 
sometimes they don't - http://www.tor.com/index.php?option=com_phocagallery&amp;view=gallery&amp;id=9428&amp;image=2405#thumbs
Sean Hannity is the worst of the worst. A smug, lying, shill cunt. I'm embarrassed for anyone that watches him with a straight face. I'm sure Obama could give less than a rat's ass about the fat 'tard.
"I find that much money in my shoe every day." I don't. =(
I don't think Jesus' views on taxes really apply to today, because Jesus didn't have any context to what government is like today. Democracy didn't exist at all. The government was simply a fact.  And what's wrong with taxes?
Oh oh, another right-wing wacko latrine scrape.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zGq6UCIKEkM
Ethnicity has nothing to do with it.  Your genetic and cultural background doesn't preclude idiocy.  Also, I have very limited exposure to major media, having given up television many years ago.   My observations are from personal experience.  I personally find people of faith to be hypocritical and unpleasant, regardless of which brand of nonsense was pumped into their young brains.  I will make one concession, which I only thought of this afternoon.  My experience with Hindus has been better than average.  Christians, Muslims, Jews, Mormons and any other western style religion seems to produce a high enough percentage of scum that I don't feel bad generalizing.  Again, all based on my experience.  I can only assume what major media outlets are spewing.  When I quit watching, one of the main reasons was because of all the ridiculous, contemptible Christian morality.  
You guys are pathetic.
I endorse him despite it.
&gt; decided to be equally inhumane and discompassionate and cruel to the Palestinians.  Listen to yourself!  Did you read the damn article?  Wow. I'm amazed at the insane comparisons that will flow unchallenged in Reddit, and actually get *upmodded*.
if the congress was all democrats and the president a demoocrat and all the supreme court justices democrats would you approve of that?
yeah, learn programming. If you want a hobby:  http://processing.org  http://openframeworks.cc
Some of them bring their own hats just in case.
Executed?  Geez why don't we just kill their family as well as long as we are going *completely overboard!*
&gt; it's ideal for anyone who loves squirtable condiments such as ketchup, mustard and brown sauce.  What the hell is brown sauce?
Das Krautenho
vinyl vader...yea, the force *is* strong, with this one!...
And all in all caused him to cry.
and go to a third party that can't get on ballots? makes NO sense
my brain gets it now. i guess i couldnt grasp that the guy who was writing it was from the US, and not The Internet.
Oh oh, another right-wing wacko latrine scrape.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zGq6UCIKEkM
U should, u won't be disappointed :) my dad and the owner are good friends (my dad was a co-owner of Toad's Place back in the 70s)
Maybe the Democrat/Republican thing should end. Maybe people should have values that they stand for without needing to be part of a distracting and asinine tug-of-war.  Then we could be for and against à la carte.
The world is the devil!
A friend of mine was in Navy R&amp;D and told me about this waaaaaaay back when dealers first came out with LCD televisions.  He said, "I shouldn't be telling you this, but we're working with some crazy ass tech right now that makes these look prehistoric."  He mentioned that they would be "rollable" for quick storage and use in battlefield scenarios, etc.  So I assume that the ones that you can roll are still only military stuff right now.  
I, too, planned to get an iPhone until the app store bad publicity.  Now I'm after an Android phone.  Unfortunately, T-mobile really irritated me when I tried (unsuccessfully) to sign up and buy a G1 on their site, so now which phone I'm getting is a little up in the air.  I'm hoping someone will manage to get Android fully functional on a phone with a full keyboard and a large screen quickly.
rule34
Back in the late 90's, a computer without Windows simply wasn't a viable option. This is still true today, although somewhat less so.  Monopoly doesn't mean that only one product is available. It means that one player controls the market, and Microsoft controls the OS market.
I like the headline but the picture doesn't make much sense?
I just don't understand why faith has ended up as such a big issue for American politics...
leeloo, however, FTW...
Maybe HTTP saw [USB OTG](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/USB_On-The-Go) and got jealous.  You have to admit: the whole master/slave swap thing is kinda kinky.
If you don't pay a full tithe in the LDS (mormon) church, they deny you some of the higher-order rituals like temple attendance.
Until some rogue theocracy breaks the treaty and unleashes an army of spry 89 year olds.
That's why I don't hang curtains in the nude (as a matter of fact,  I did hang curtains precisely so that I could walk around in the buff without scaring my neighbors)
i started this thread 2 hours ago, give me some time lol
I've always wondered if God was a big tipper, or if he's a cheapskate like those self-important bigshots we always hear about.
Yeah, it had it's moments, but I think people just ain't relating to the wacky adventures of a Texas Republican family, cartoon or not. Now, if we can get Family Guy cancelled for good, and burn the reruns.
I've been waiting for this since 1968, revenge!
Yeah, I was interested until I saw who posted this. Now I rather doubt it is true.
I finally am on a connection that doesnt fuck with bittorent, so I'm looking for a good tracker. Member based is fine, but they have to actually be taking signups.
Are you trying to steal Captain Obvious' job? Not cool man. Not cool. Especially in this economy.
Or, to prevent them marking you for death, you could be really, really nice, give them donuts and coffee, and shine them on 'till hell won't have it. We call this tactic Minnesota Nice.
Please put down your weapon. You have 20 seconds to comply. 
Again there's still the problem that it really only results in the entrenching of political parties, whenever a party list (open or closed) is used. STV may be a slightly better option, however it has the same aim in mind: entrenching certain political parties.   If I may ask you a few questions: what is the aim of proportional representation, other than mere proportionality of votes? What are the consequences and the downsides to it?
This is just so people will shut up when they spend (more of) the bailout on bonuses.
Will we have a Progressive Party in the coming years?
I'd vote for this lady before i'd ever vote for Palin.
My friend is going as a Banana in Pajamas
:[
No, he's really just a "maverick" 
Northampton loves you, and wants you back!
Oh man, that country just keeps getting better and better.
Or Gigli.
Here kitty, kitty, kitty. Whoa kitty! STOP kitty!
Stupid MIT, only admitting hipsters.
Let's see... if Obama accepted this it would be an illegal contribution, but if he doesn't then he must hate his family.  Hannity knows damn well it would be illegal for Obama to accept such an offer... or maybe he doesn't judging by the volume of Republicans being indicted these days.
Go with the 6th.  The 5th is reserved for "I told you so" and "It's a conspiracy".
Ode to Sean Hannity (by John Cleese)  Aping urbanity Oozing with vanity Plump as a manatee Faking humanity Journalistic calamity Intellectual inanity Fox Noise insanity You’re a profanity Hannity
i think there needs to be 3 equally represented parties mandated but that is just me
And it's McCain....  Time for a nice walk and some warm milk.
Definitely voting no. And actually, around this part of CA, it ain't gays that are freaking out.
This was the campaign ad McCain used in 08 A.D.
Most people either just have it for free, or get it as apart of the Adobe CS3/4 Web Premium Suite.
Yeah. Its like communication majors think advertising works or something.
You can choose to not receive messages...
The point of video games isn't to emulate life. Being a game designer he should be well aware of it. My point stands: virtually every person who ever chose that dialog option without already knowing what would happen immidiately reloaded a savegame afterward. Those are situations designers should work to avoid.   
&gt;you **seem** too nice.  When in actuality, he is a raging penis sore. So, industry fits.
damnit, now i'm listening to that song...  "Don't download this song,  Even Lars Ulrich knows it's wrong"
Famous really?
I just boil 'em for a while.  Or you can nuke 'em too.  Any way that puts energy in.
Dammit... she's a druid!
With all the revisionist history floating around, I've always wondered, even if we study history how do we know what we are being taught is true? This seems to be a fundamental problem no one talks about. If we don't have the time or money to go check physical evidence ourselves, what can we do other than go with the story that seems to have the most support?  Perhaps history should be taught more scientifically, explaining what physical evidence exists and building stories from there, so at least in theory everything is verifiable.
Most people don't know this, but the same issue is on the Florida ballot.  Polls show that it will be defeated.  Let's hope.
Chances are that bum has cable.
No, because desire (and therefore suffering) is the normal human condition. You can temper your desires, but you can't be desire-less, unless you are a buddha.  Then again I would have thought that someone who calls himself haoest would know something of that.
Wish my credit card worked this way.
a great way to get started on your way to true freedom!
Gallup gets a lot of CIA gigs.
Fuck me. There is gonna be a civil war isn't there?
I believe the argument is that the old adage of "useful and tangible" is no longer applicable.  So is this actually a victory for open source?  In the short term it appears so because it invalidates a lot of patent suits, but if "tangible result" is no longer a necessary element of a patent, then a piece of information or software/algorithm could theoretically be patented.  He also claimed this was a terrible day for the economy.  Has he considered that it's possible that giving everyone access to free software, even though it will mean a drop in the amount of money spent on software, is BETTER for the economy?
It's freshly mined Cobalt Thorium G... oh fuck.
Oh oh, another right-wing wacko latrine scrape.  Check this out instead, these guys aren't worried about more important things: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vFM1xqqTX_g&amp;feature=related
I see the little bit of quality you attempted to maintain in your titles has pretty much gone to shit the closer we get to election day.  Hopefully it's reflective of how well McCain's campaign has paid off come Tuesday. And really, who the hell takes Limbaugh even remotely serious?  
the point of this thread is to let them know reddit isn't dumb.
Oh oh, another right-wing wacko latrine scrape.  Check this out instead, these guys aren't worried about more important things: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vFM1xqqTX_g&amp;feature=related
